type of stop you wish to host (interview or guest blog)
Over New Year's Eve, Amelia's older cousins got her involved in a game of Ring Around the Rosie. Of course, the falling down part was really fun and she began to anticipate when to fall down when she got to the right part in the song. Tonight I caught her turning around and circles and falling down on the floor. So I started to sing Ring Around the Rosie and her face lit up. She did it about 5 times going in circles and falling down.
For a country in receipt of a colossal IMF/EU bailout and for which many decisions need comply with a bailout Memorandum of Understanding, a small neutral conventionally-powered country with one TD per 30,000 people, a country with 14% unemployment, debt:GDPN rising to 120%, these salaries and allowances and perks look obscene. There was an open letter on here last week to the British prime minister which was tongue-in-cheek and was intended to highlight the country’s subordination by our neighbour who is bailing us out, to highlight some very high salaries in the higher echelons of the law enforcement/judicial/legislative sectors with poor laws on the ground and an abundance of law-breaking. It was also intended to highlight commercial distortions in our economy which has yet to be allowed naturally adjust to the economic collapse. So the letter was tongue-in-cheek, but I wonder is it time for having well-placed questions asked in our neighbour’s parliament about the pigtroughery in this country which is massively insolvent and which faces a vista of a further three years of ever more constricting austerity? After all, not all British MPs were supportive of bailing out any EuroZone country.
September 14th 2011
On Thursday the TT girls met for Breakfast but no scrapping :( Desi is in the States with her family and the others were busy but it was lovely to catch up as I really miss them when I am away. I had so much to sort out afterwards, shopping, catching up on mail and all the happenings at Let's Scrap and the day kind of got away from me.
VOILA!! Much better!
We get a wonderful glimpse of Harrenhall – or what’s left of it after dragons burned it out centuries ago as Arya, Gendry and the other prisoners are all marched in. One by one they’re being tortured by Gregor “The Mountain” Clegane and his men. It is their first night there that we first hear what I like to call Arya’s Lament. Listen carefully because over the books (and now seasons of the show) the names will change but her desire for justice never really leaves her.
* Depth of Field
See how the food manufacturers have trained our palates?
Me: Okay. 'Count' means kira. So, countable?
The paint was obviously not the original coating and was easily sanded off to reveal the metal in the bottom photo. Although, as I started sanding and there were still bit and pieces of paint left on, that was a lovely finish too.
FYI- No need to hunt for your rabbit these days, most grocery stores carry most game meats packaged and ready to go for your convenience.
And round two.
As a novelist I have to select where I place my window into the past and discard what won’t fit my recreation of it. That makes me a bad historian, as my history teacher rightly recognised, but I hope it makes me a better novelist.
What General Weygand called the Battle of France is over. I expect that the Battle of Britain is about to begin. Upon this battle depends the survival of Christian civilization. Upon it depends our own British life, and the long continuity of our institutions and our Empire. The whole fury and might of the enemy must very soon be turned on us. Hitler knows that he will have to break us in this Island or lose the war. If we can stand up to him, all Europe may be free and the life of the world may move forward into broad, sunlit uplands. But if we fail, then the whole world, including the United States, including all that we have known and cared for, will sink into the abyss of a new Dark Age made more sinister, and perhaps more protracted, by the lights of perverted science. Let us therefore brace ourselves to our duties, and so bear ourselves that, if the British Empire and its Commonwealth last for a thousand years, men will still say, ‘This was their finest hour’.
Perhaps he simply assumed that the Order, wounded and outnumbered, wouldn't be willing to press the issue to combat (or that the Claw would easily dispatch them if they tried). Well, he was not counting on the Order's fury when played for a fool (and I was not counting on them being so intact after the battle with the warforged dragons).
VIDAL: Again, we are not advancing a specific solution, a specific
“Yo soy una prostituta Colombiana, y apruebo este mensaje! Donde esta mi 47 dolares?”
Then she called her husband, and said to him:
Well, in this last relationship, there were comments about how his ex wouldn't get up and shower on a given day and he'd be like, "What the hell? Aren't you going to do something with yourself today?" He wouldn't necessarily say it aloud, but he'd think it. He was also sure to tell me about it. Repeatedly. And he'd jokingly (we know that most of what people say jokingly, there is usually some truth to, right?) make comments if he came home from work on Saturday and I hadn't gotten myself showered, dressed and made up. Eventually, I began to feel the pressure of having to go through my morning routine seven days a week. This is not relaxing for me. It's stressful. And I allowed this to take over. I allowed this to happen. I didn't allow myself to be me nor was I with someone who was accepting of me.
When I eventually got the patch looking like a patch of earth and not a wasteland. It was time to get planting. I said earlier that I binned a whole load of strawberry plants that were covering large proportions of the allotment and this might seem wasteful, but I wanted to start with new virus free stock in order to manage our fruit properly. We may as well start as we wish to go on..
But Mary is convinced that something exists beyond the village, she doesn’t believe they are the last humans on Earth, the chosen of God.
Now doesn't that look so much better. It isn't wasted space and I can get to my canned foods so much easier.
When I say PINK just think, think, think. (tap temple with finger)
Pennfield Jensen, ADI Vice President
This morning, of course, I woke up bright and early and finished the seaming and then made Emma and Doug go outside and take more photos, for the sake of honesty and thoroughness in knitting blog reporting.
2- recycle curbside as much as you can- save yourself the time in your car and gas usage- if you can leave it at the curb, do it.
Malaysia
Frustration is soothed
So I need to run some errands. Both girls wanted to stay home with my husband. I ask Layla if I take her with me will she behave? She said, "No". I asked her why, "Because it will be too crowded, and I will feel nervous."
So, this is a controlled rant. Why? Over the years I have found it is much easier to find the root of the problem and concentrate on ranting on that root rather than the whole tree. The associate that helped us originally, was very good at her job and did everything right. It was the delivery company that caused the problem and then because they don't have to deal with me directly, can sit on their lazy butt and just say 'no' for no reason. The store is at their mercy as well seeing as how they only have one delivery company.
Khrushchev's policy of de-Stalinisation eclipsed the Abominables who, in an exquisite example of Marxian anti-thesis, then became the literal backbone of the dissident movement. On the fall of Soviet power, the ethnic-Kyrgyz and Russian party leaders were swept away by a liberal faction led by a close-shaven Yeti physicist who used the nom de l'homme of Askar Akayev.
Clearly, it was laying in wait, hiding out in my closet until I had the sense to get myself some coral heels!
Having assembled the relevant pieces of the jigsaw, the judge now moved to consider the picture so revealed. Again, beginning from first principles, Norris J noted that the job of the court was to compensate the claimant and not to punish the defendants. Accordingly, peering into the murky waters of possibility, he explained that Perini had lost the chance to supply two lines in accordance with its quotations provided to LPC at the time. Following some discussion, this was concluded as being a theoretical maximum of 3.824 million Euros.
My 10-day stay spanned New Year's Eve, allowing Lauren and I to celebrate our 24th birthdays together and take advantage of some treasured time off from our newly acquired jobs. It rained every day of that trip. Getting around was messy and difficult. The four steep flights of stairs up to her apartment were a real kick in the ass at the end of our long cold days touring the city. I was uncomfortable and unsure of myself in this new place... feelings with which I was not familiar. The change was invigorating. I felt alive.
He was here. He took a deep breath, swallowed, and raised a hand to knock.
Not only does the partial plot summary I've just attempted leave out major characters and incidents, but the very form of a summary may be wholly inadequate to the task of conveying just what is so special about Margaret. This is why we get more pleasure out of watching great movies than reading reviews of them, or worse, of their screenplays. Filmmaking is like a form of alchemy, mysterious and unscientific in the way it can combine elements it's almost impossible to evaluate in isolation, or even to describe with mere words, into a time-based talisman with the power to transmute a viewer's emotional state. Some of the elements in Margaret that I've yet to see adequately described include: the cinematography by Polish DP Ryszard Lenczewski, far more cinematic than that for director Kenneth Lonergan's prior film You Can Count On Me. The plaintively arpeggiated music by composer Nico Muhly. Or the line-readings; there is something perfectly teenage about the way Paquin, who was 23 at the time of filming, says things like "I think I'll stop generalizing now."
*Of course, at some point you’ve got to wonder whether even that serves a purpose.
After reading My Soul to Keep, I picked up this book immediately and man, this was a page-turner. Suddenly, I was engrossed in the story and I didn't expect it to happen. I started this book at 11 pm right after I put down My Soul To Keep. I read until 2 am and slept. I didn't want to put it down, but a girl needs to sleep. So the next morning, I picked it up again immediately and finish it that same morning. It was fast. I didn't want it to end but I'm dying to read If I Die after the book swept me off the bed with all those emotions...
And now, it is time to go. Time to be. Time to fly, Peter Pan.
On the "full disclosure" front, Consumer Watchdog has been a longtime (and relentless) critic of Google, and recently received flak on it's criticism of Google's privacy policies and decision to run a Times Square jumbotron advertisement in September portraying Google as a massive invader of privacy, and caricaturing its ex-CEO Eric Schmidt as a "creepy, high-tech ice cream vendor who profiles children" (link1, link2).
Serviceberries, to my eye, are more elegant, with widely-spaced branches, and feathery flowers held in elongated clusters. My specimen, Amelanchier x grandiflora 'Autumn Brilliance', finally bloomed two days ago. It's opening unevenly, still a day or two away from full bloom. Perhaps it's as suspicious of our early Spring as I am, hoarding its treasures lest they all be squandered at once to a hard frost.
I’m finally getting on to writing about William A Wellman films made after the Hays code was enforced – although there are still just a few more of his pre-Codes which I hope to track down in the future! His 1935 drama The Call of the Wild, very loosely adapted from Jack London’s classic novel, has been released on DVD, but only as part of a region 1 box set, the Clark Gable Collection Vol 1. Sadly, it seems that the only surviving print is 14 minutes shorter than the original release, 81 minutes long rather than the original 95 - according to the imdb, the film was reissued during the Second World War, and some scenes were chopped out as they were felt to be too daring.
Till then the many organs of Zion which infest the net, some sites and blogs that many self-proclaimed nationalist sites link to, gnash their teeth in rage, vent their spleen and generally rail against the decision to take down the Zionist Defence Leagues website. For us, we real Europeans, we caught up within this contrived clash of civilisations ,for us it may help to know that at least one angry gentile, one angry individual may be saved from the manipulation of Zionists. Of course we must realise that this is but one small set-back for malignancy, one small wound in the belly of the great beast and in any event the jury is out as to whether they have done their job and their presence is still needed. Personally I believe that they have much poison to sow, much hatred to augment and much subversion to partake in.
is that i can’t see
for the strength of these people
We were invited for afternoon coffee and dinner. My younger one had a lot of fun to waiter. Some guests gave him a tip. So afterwards he was very proud to have earned something totally.
ESET Senior Research Fellow
Basically we were a hot mess.
The original picture was perfectly focused, here I had purposely softened the image with Gaussian blur and painted out the blurred insides of the objects leaving the outside edges slightly blurred.
By all accounts, the ­procedure seems to have been a ­disaster. Instead of a lovely, new look, Mrs Johnson was left with the same old face, only with the unwelcome addition of a terrible new twitch.
For centuries the caterpillars of Twig Valley have lived with a Dark Cloud over the land. For as long as anyone can remember, no caterpillar has ever become a butterfly. In fact, no one thinks about being anything more than a bug that crawls in the dust of the ground.
You know that poor kid continued to cry on and off for the rest of the evening, and even laid down after dinner. The experience totally knocked the wind out of him.
So I’m going to conclude my review with a recommendation I never thought I’d give: set the book aside and watch the movie instead. You’ll get the same incredible story, without the overdose of grime.
I have tried to get in touch with Jon England, but unsuccessfully - I hope he will not mind that I have included these images. I don't know if his work will be exhibited in other places, but if it is, I urge you to go and see it. It strikes me that, in a sense, he is doing in visual terms what we as historical novelists do in words: he is responding to an event which happened in the past and which moves him, in the medium in which he is most at ease. I certainly found the exhibition absorbing and moving - and not only because I could imagine that my father could have been one of those bundled-up figures trudging through the snow. Like my father, like so many of that generation, Ted Milligan has now died: but I think it's wonderful that, thanks to his collaboration with Jon, his work, and his experiences, live on.
If you had an reservations about seeing this movie, don't, go see it now! I can't give this movie higher praise for a comic book geek point of view. The density of the material covered by the film might leave non-comic book geeks a bit lost, but it is a sweet reward to any Avengers fans.
One thing I noticed was how difficult it was not speaking the language. Though I am nowhere near close to a fluent level in French, I can easily communicate important things, and even hold semi-interesting conversations. In Italy, I was limited to "ciao", "bella", and the combination- "ciao bella". Maybe throw in a "buon giorno"and that was the extent of my vocabulary. I felt disabled and alienated at times... it put things in a different perspective for me. the language barrier can be impossible, but we made it through- and it made for hilarious, awkward interactions!
"Um...thanks," I said.
The post sets the stage for the event:
The last time we re-skeined, we got a bit done, but this time we needed to make a MUCH bigger dent to the box of skeins that were just waiting for us. Instead of meeting at 6 and working until 11:45 pm (serious dedication, right?), we decided to meet around 4. Before going over to my friend Robin's house, I had to run errands (I couldn't show up without a dessert and flowers!), go to the post office (again!) and get gas in the car.
This card is made with diy patterned papers. One stamped with butterflies, The stamp is from Inkadinkadoo. The other paper was made with flower and leaf stamps from a set called Porcelain Bouquet by Rubber Stamp Topiary. All the paper is from my stash. Bling is by Darice. The stamped sentiment is embossed.
Hey there! I need to share this Valentine-y card with you! I created this for my submission to the 2012 Spellbinders Design Team, but unfortunately I was not chosen to continue to the next round :(
about positions. You are touching everything
* Holding the phone away from your head a couple inches helps too. Or better yet, put your cell on speaker phone.
But this is where the story becomes more complex when Mitsuko starts trying to figure out why her boyfriend killed himself, she goes to his home to return his biker helmet and starts looking for clues in his room. She sees posters of the pop band Dessert all over his wall, she figures out a hidden clue in one of the posters that spells the word SUICIDE. Then she discovers a password that leads to the backstage area where Dessert is scheduled to perform, Mitsuko goes to the concert hall and enters the code which leads backstage. And then she finds dozens of children running around with no parents anywhere in sight. I think this is a powerful scene that really has plenty of depth and meaning behind it, it becomes obvious that these young children are the real masterminds behind all the suicides. And their motives are simple enough for a child to understand but in a world where people complicate things and can’t say what they mean or what they feel that lack of communication leads to a disconnection from themselves and the people around them. I think it also says alot about the generation gap where the police never took their involvement in the suicides seriously because they are just kids. Sion Sono takes a child’s innocent voice in the final scene to add so much depth and complex meaning behind the story. Children are well known in any society for being uncorrupted and having no guile, but bluntly speaking the truth as they see it. And that is what makes this scene so powerful, is that these children see what is wrong with their society and are bluntly addressing those issues without pretense.
don't dance so fast.
Julia is paying her student loans at the lower interest rate. Good for her. Again, nothing offset those costs, but hey Julia is better off today. It is her children who will pay for that lower interest rate down the road.
Carnegie attributes his ascent to superior energy and ability, characteristics that paralleled the Social Darwinian world of nature in which the fittest members of the species predominated. He and his fellow captains of industry perceived themselves as visionaries who stepped into a disorganized economy, restored order and rationality, and provided American consumers the best products and services at the lowest costs: labor-saving devices, more and better food, creature comforts, and parks and theaters.
BUT! I take all these as positives. I’m moving more. I’m getting less insulin. My urine looked good today (well, what I pee’ed on the floor at the office after they drew my blood – I at least didn’t pee ON someone this time). I just need to get the hind legs in motion better and I think I might have licked this thing!
He saw the great light of the ancient wisdom on the new feathers of dawn
It is utterly impossible to be in both Bristol AND Cardiff simultaneously.
“Wake up.”
We are called to do all we can to live unified, as one (at peace) with each other (Romans 12:18). We cannot be restored to the center of God’s will and purpose if we are not restored to each other, which brings us to the second part of this second meaning of joy.
I scarfed the whole thing in three bites and it's official. I am a convert to the Oeuf en Gelée, or as I call them: Jello Cups of Champions. Some have a tomato in them, others have cornichons, a bit of parsley or estragon. I have no idea what time of day the French eat them but these are my new breakfast of champions.
We were all so pleased to hear of their wonderful visit. Dad has wonderful friends and it is so good they continue to come and visit him. I know it means the world to Dad.
No other companies can get away with that.... McDonalds can't be like "Buddup-bup-bup-baaaaaahhh YOU CAN EAT THIS!"
“Understood.”
Meanwhile in New York:
WIND: 3,294
Thanks so much to the very fashionable Haley from Cardigan Junkie for stepping in for me today while I'm out of town and sharing her summer staple ideas. When you check out her blog you are sure to leave with many outfit inspirations! Take it away Haley.
Here's a perfect example! I loved this crossword stamp set and haven't even inked it up, yet. Well, that's all going to change with this card. I'm going to start inking up these less loved sets.
After a discussion of fingerprints, Dr. Lyle said he was watching the arrival of a new identification system—the antibody profile. Everyone's will be different, although they will also change over time.
Today is the day that most Americans are required to file their taxes. (Not Mitt Romney, of course, who has filed for an extension…) Thanks to President Obama and a strong push from fair-minded progressives, this requirement has sparked a lot of conversation about tax fairness and tax rates. Billionaire Warren Buffett also helped lead the charge, making a recommendation which has come to bear his name: The Buffett Rule. This would require that anyone making more that $1Million in a year would be required to pay a minimum tax rate of 30%. This proposal is wildly popular, polling at over 70% approval, including support from many of the people who would be required to pay the higher rate. Senate leader Harry Reid brought forward the Buffett Rule for a vote yesterday. It was denied cloture along mostly party lines missing the 60 votes required to move to a vote on the matter itself.
Anyway, I'm not feeling so good now; I think I am coming down with something. I'll likely take some more time off to rest and recuperate. See you back here in a few days.
Zoya Kate is a pinkish grapefruit inspired by The Small Things. Gorgeous!! Again, this is four generous coats. This color screams: "Summer!!" I love this fruity shade of pink. :)
I have to start some fundraisers again for the ACPCG. Donations are at an all time low and just ordered prints for three very under-privileged families who are losing and have lost their child, and the account is now near empty.
I smack him.
Tues 15th
A memory from my childhood popped into my racing thoughts. It was a bizarre memory to be emerging at this moment: a memory of a vision I had at my grandma’s house when I was a boy. My cousins came over to play with my brothers and me. Everyone ran inside to get a drink. As I lingered behind and found myself alone in the large yard, my eye caught something in the sky. I looked up and saw something incredible and golden up above Portland’s West Hills. I could not tell if it was real or just my imagination playing games with me. It was also Easter weekend, which made everything seem even stranger . . . or maybe stronger?
Therefore if you ensure that your diet plan is up to the mark nutritionally with your vegan eating routine, health wise what are the payback? The American Dietetic Association says that a well-planned diet plan is healthful, nutritionally adequate, and may help in the healing and prevention of particular diseases, including cancer. Those on a vegan diet plan had been tested to possess lower cholesterol levels, blood pressure, in addition to hypertension and type-2 diabetes versus nonvegetarians. They typically have a reduced body mass index, and also have been found to live longer. These are all admirable reasons to consider a vegan diet plan.
“When we stood on stage for the first time. After practicing for 7 years, it was the stage we were waiting for the most. It was as good and as meaningful as that. Before going on stage, we always shout ‘EXO-K let’s love’ as a fighting. As soon as we got off stage, our legs were shaking because we were exhausted. Our parents too told us ‘We thought our hearts were going to explode.”(Baekhyun)
I did end up making a lot of soup. The lack of vegetable broth available for the holiday made that a smidge challenging in the flavor department. I was perfectly happy to eat bland soup, but that’s not really fun for anyone else joining me. I made a pureed butternut squash soup, similar to this one, except using water instead of broth. I also added more sweet potato and carrots, which helped the flavor a lot. When it came time to puree, I realized I didn’t have a blender for Passover, so I had to mash everything up with a wooden spoon. That was not so much fun.
Late summer
medium wash skinnies (American Eagle via sister's closet)
- A review of the Spinal Muscular Atrophy (SMA) products under development by companies and universities/research institutes based on information derived from company and industry-specific sources.
I used the above colored flowers in the Sparkle N Sprinkle Autumn Inspirations Blog Hop, so tune in, on Thursday the 25th of August, to see how the card turned out!
leftover paint I had for wood border
At first the tournament was called off as the first venue was waterlogged because of all the rain. But fortunately the organisers managed to find another venue in Hawkinge which is near Folkestone in Kent only about 3 miles from the English Channel and apparently on a clear day you can see France.
The suicide rate continues to rise alarmingly. The latest is a doctor in Nouakchott, who allegedly died after injecting himself with a drug and then severing an artery.
Dread at the disturbing tour de force of madness that was Cleo Laine. But also at the audience members Sir Jimmy was hanging around with throughout the show, who seemed to get more and more menacing as it went along. If the past really is a foreign land, it seems it's a foreign land we must sometimes mark with just three words.
The complaint stated that on March 21, Stein was notified by his commanding officer that he was recommended for discharge because of alleged misconduct, including statements made against the president.
But we can also see there are chinks in your argument – that a few of your human males and females are starting to take off your blinders. And so we conclude with one of your own poets, Billy Collins, who frames it all quite nicely – perhaps even better than we could have done ourselves. (Collins, you are always welcome to visit space.)
So, last week I presented some recipes and sort-of challenge to bake and make from scratch. Since then I've been searching on line to find a homemade alternative to Bisquick. There are some recipes that I really like that used it, but I don't want to buy it. This is one of the few things that I've missed from my pared down grocery list! I found some recipes, but I haven't made any yet. The one recipe I trust most is from King Arthur flour. My biggest hesitation is that it calls for shortening, which I really don't want to use anymore. I have about half a can of butter flavored Crisco that once it is gone, will not be replaced. I've only been using it to grease my baking pans. I'm thinking of substituing the shortening with coconut oil. Any other suggestions are very welcome!
Censorship
BACK IN THE EARLY 70s, things were very straightforward. Real ale, the traditional beer of Britain, with all its rich palette of flavours and characters, was under attack from cold, bland, fizzy, standardised keg beer. This was always a touch simplistic, especially when people tried to apply it to beers from other countries that had no tradition of “real ale”. However, in terms of what was actually happening in this country at the time, it was a reasonable enough approximation to the truth, and it allowed CAMRA to mount a campaign that led to it being described as “the most successful consumer movement in Europe”.
Photo from HOMEWOOD HOUSE,
My thought is that at some point we can all be a suckeroo. It's our response to the insults, trials and tribulations of life that differentiates the busters from the criminals.
Net, we would expect that the potential impact on Brent crude oil prices in 2012 to be closer to $5-7 a barrel on average
We all have someone in our lives who is the primary caregiver at home for a loved one. This article has made me realize how important that we are there to offer our support, as the role of caregiver can end abruptly. When this happens, they may struggle with feelings of fear, lose, guilt and anger that can be very destructive. Read article here>>
The task based approach to innovation has the power to change the world of business as we know it. Companies no longer have to rely on doubtful customer input to make critical investments, or wonder why their innovation failed despite extensive research with customers. The choice frameworks provided in this paper are a clear guiding light to help companies navigate the landscape of customer tasks much more effectively. Making the right choice of research techniques, parameters to change and marketing strategies while utilizing a task based approach will help companies unlock value from their customers and create innovations that change both their own fate and the lives of customers everywhere.
Today, Peter Billingsley is 40 and is working as an actor, producer, and director. He most recently directed the 2009 Vince Vaughn comedy “Couples Retreat”.
I also just sewed an adorable throw pillow for a sweet upcoming arrival's nursery, and once I get permission from Mom-to-be, I'll post pictures and instructions!
leaves.
Ultimate Power
'I was just a baby marine when I went out there. The Prince read the citation and he just said he couldn't believe it,' Marine Jackson said.
COLOR DETAILS AND RGB CODES
Uh-huh. (quiet chuckle) We look forward to seeing you! (False, overly peppy tone noted)
**Attention, person who knows how this was managed–some things are better not explained, so don’t spoil the air of mystery, please.
Ultimately this deal went through for three reasons. Firstly, the aforementioned integration with its existing application. Simply put, Skype fits into its “push to the cloud” philosophy of recent years. Secondly, the brand name. Skype has a significant brand name and this can be leveraged to push the likes of Lync further. Only Google (“to google”) and Apple (“i…”) have a stronger presence in the conscience of the average user. Finally, this move will also help Microsoft maintain a market lead over the likes of Google, (GChat), Facebook and Yahoo! and with market share comes profit
He tucked it to his chest and leaned closer. “I’ll make sure to return it the next time I see you.”
The Buddha famously would not be drawn into debate about our cosmic origins, nor into stating absolute truths about the universe. Buddhism doesn't tend to make statements about things that can't be relatively simply identified by individual non-expert experience, empirically. (Of course it requires attention and motivation.) I don't think this is widely recognised.
Thu-AM: 1:18, 3000' ~ 2nd Flatiron+Green Mt.
Here’s the weight graph for this week anyways, which doesn’t really make sense as I haven’t logged for every single day… But hey, I love a visual aid…
result: short legs, odd shadows, and an ugly truck appendage growing out of my arm
For overall 1st, 2nd and 3rd, I made trophy tubes. Filled with stoplight-colored candies, I simply added a prize ribbon to the top. To make the ribbons, I layered cardstock circles and added an extra-large SRM number sticker. The embellishment flags were easy to make, too. I cut a two inch length of ribbon and hot glued it to a lollipop stick.
As an aside, I also boasted that I was going to steal a bike and ride it through the main corridor of the library...which I didn't do. Epic. Failure. On my behalf.
Luke Schwartz and friends
in the shadow of Mt. Helios.
He was also hosting two others but they were out exploring the city.
With a divorce in the works, and still one child not yet grown (now at high school) she admits that she should have seen this coming. She wishes she had been more prepared. "I'm getting older and jobs aren't falling into my lap," she worries.
Def: warrior
Recommendation $11,500
All too soon we had to bid farewell to the Museum, but we had a blast seeing all the tags, paintings and other doggie related items.
Do you like going to the dentist? Please tell me I'm not the only one with this phobia.
So I have alluded to problems and here they are.... I have PTSD from my loved one committing suicide in 2008 and I walked in on the end of it....I had blocked this for a long time because I guess my insides couldnt face it and I had my youngest daughters little kids to take care of.
This is our Top Secret Envelope Redemption weekend. We have had lots of questions about the envelopes so hopefully I will answer all your questions.
So you might say they really have all their ducks in a row in Cambria. Waddle they think of next?
I took a pic of her yesterday and she didn't know why. I just said smile and she did. Mom is my best friend and she inspires me on a daily basis! I wish I was good with words like a lot of you out there to explain what mom means to me. She is my best friend, confidant and so much more. Of course she rocks the jewelry making business and I would be truly lost without her, but like I said, she is my best friend. Thanks mom for being my inspiration on a daily basis!!!!
- Thick balsamic vinegar
The objection to the term ‘Red Indians’ seems to be in calling them ‘red’ whereas, I would have thought, the objection should be in calling them ‘Indians’, which they are clearly not. It’s a bit like St Petersburg being re-named Leningrad and then being re-named St Petersburg. Does it really change the city? If ‘Red Indians’ were called something incorrectly and it was used perfectly unobjectionably for years, why change it?
Don’t take our word for it. Here’s what the late Richard Rorty, one of the most prominent post-modern philosophers of the 20th century, said on the subject:
Gesturing for him to sit down, Moody wasn’t surprised when he remained standing. Looking down on someone put the seated person on a lower level, thereby weakening them and giving the person standing an illusion of power.
This is a decisive moment in our history to assert our humanity and restore our dignity as a people. Enough is enough!
.rascism is ignorance
the world's breast is a broad façade.
So is my theory...
A Preparation for Death is an account of the frustrations and consolations of literature. In struggling to do it justice, or at least explain its seduction (how it had its easy way with me, as I blushed and giggled like a teenager), I am reduced to impersonating Martin Amis on Saul Bellow, and just quoting paragraph after paragraph.
Do you have an old t-shirt that you really love? Maybe it's the wrong size or it has a tear and you can't wear it anymore. Today I'd like to show you some ways to repurpose those beloved t-shirts.
DKUUN Blog (dkuunblog.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
Parti Rakyat Sarawak (PRS) president James Masing, who is dead against new parties entering Sarawak’s political scene, seems oblivious to the basic principles of democracy, according to opposition PKR.
Turmeric dissolves
And when your little sister REALLY starts to get on your nerves, and all the squeeing and oohs and ahhs, and "isn't puppy breath the best" comments get annoying, just remember that you are house-trained and she's not. And if you forget it, you can rest assured that she'll remind everyone pretty quickly that she hasn't quite learned "OUTSIDE" yet! Heehee!
A sad comment on a life.
I try, I cannot see
Ideal Home Show at Christmas has teamed up with simply.food to give you the chance to WIN one of 5 pairs of tickets.
Such an idea is tapping the growing mobile payments behavior and giving people serious reasons to use mobile for payments. Why I am mentioning mobile here is because you need a smartphone to use Foursquare, Facebook & Twitter apps to take part in these offers on-the-go with Amex. This saves the headache of printing coupons, remembering codes and saving eCoupons etc. It is seamless and such payments are on their way to becoming a part of daily life for many smartphone users and Amex has certainly made a smart move here to offer benefits to their customers on-the-go!
Two spinster sisters in Fairacre peer anxiously at the new family across the road, not sure whether to accept them, until the mother goes into labor on Christmas Day. A sweet tale of Christmas joy in a village I love. (Link is to a 3-in-1 edition of Miss Read’s Christmas tales that includes this story.)
“But” presents a contrast, which isn’t readily apparent from the original phrasing of the line. Those two clauses pretty much mean the same thing. She doesn’t think her family is famous, so Mazui should’ve used “and” or just reworded the sentence.
Of course, the problem that both are consistently unable to confront is that people don’t think that either coalition partner is taking the tough route. They and their parties are widely seen as opting for an easier programme of screwing the less well-off and where child benefits are swiped from families faster than you can say
but that's okay....because as somebody pointed out, I now have 101 of you
I’ve journaled. I’ve painted. I’ve played piano.
I am going to bake you a retard cake and buy you a new helmet.
But then I think of you waiting past the shadows
While the school is not solely responsible for what ends up in kids’ bellies, I believe they become largely responsible for what, when, and how much most kids eat, and this makes it all the more important that we focus on the role this environment can play in shaping the health of kids. Realistically, both the family and school affect a child’s health, but which party do you think is more important in shaping kids’ diets?
All right, it’s almost morning. Great stuff, Barack, and Merry Christmas to Michelle and the kids! Ho ho ho!
Why have you rejected me?
Through changing my job title/description, I wasn’t trying to avoid being the Youth Pastor (especially since that was never my actual job title), I was trying to elevate what it means to be a Youth Pastor to the level of respect it is due. Please, do not ask Youth Pastors when they’re going to become “real pastors” – unless you’re trying to tell them they aren’t real pastors already.
Quilting cotton scraps for house back, roof, window, and door
This week we are revealing a fresh new look for JustRite Papercraft and launching the beginning of a new stamp line called Amy Tedder Designs and Amy is launching a new blog called Amy Tedder Designs. You can see the entire release on Amy's Blog today!! To help Amy celebrate the launch of her new line we are giving away a Fab Blog Candy Prizes. Leave a message on Amy's new blog telling her what your favorite JustRite Stamp set is and for every 100 comments she gets we will pick a winner who will receive the entire April Release - that's8 Amy Tedder Design stamps sets for free!
Ed asked everyone which game they preferred and it was if they were both being paid by me because they said they liked them equally. Jenna slightly preferred Hog the Remote, but said she would definitely buy But Wait, There’s More to play with her friends. Overall, it was a fantastic gaming session with Ed! I’m excited about the prospects for both these games! He said we should know one way or the other in 3-4 weeks.
QuicKutz Nesting Scallop Hearts
5300 is now an immediate term support for Nifty
3 tbsp unsweetened Dutch process cocoa powder
At school I go every Monday to a club called Bible Club, and it was partly through this club that I ended up starting this blog. Today we discussed everyone’s favorite verses, and one of them was the above verse. It is hard to come up with a topic that you can discuss on extensively, and this verse gave me several ideas on how this could be applied to modern society.
The modern Males is the existing cult item among the Belstaff range.This Jumper can be a water-proof become cotton hat,and as mentioned before relives the time frame for the success with the Belstaff Street motorcycle Jackets manufacturer.Of course,the actual item with all the Natural Motorcycle Series is certainly totally modified.The decrease is definitely mastered,making sure a good a fantastic offer better fit.
how to survive more days in the month
8. Boys rite better than girls. (**how cute is that?!)
Mormon View:
1 green pepper, julienned
Again, there is a place for these times together. There’s nothing inherently wrong with them. But let’s face it… these opportunities don’t necessarily produce growing disciples.
Lewis Carroll
Some say it is their own fault but a cool bar is unreal and like being in a dream so people lose sense of the real world outside that they will re-enter at closing time, and drink too much. There is the use of the hallucinatory effects of drugs in adverts. I saw an advert for vodka shots, which was a square of undulating shades of blue light. You do not see these colours by drinking vodka, gulps of air or not. You see this by taking ecstasy.
(You may have noticed that I omitted to mention any similar revelations regarding the other supposed benefit of 'organic' produce - the moral/ethical ingredient - but then I sense it's better to leave all of you hopelessly decent individuals to judge that aspect of 'organic' produce for yourselves.)
Next stop was AM Solar in Springfield, Oregon ( http://www.amsolar.com/ 541-726-1091) where our good friend and all-around RV electrical wizard, Greg Holder, checked out our RV's non-performing inverter. He announced that it had an incurable boo-boo and installed a new, improved one (inverter, that is). Inverters are a (gulp!) big ticket item.
These scrubs are incredibly easy to make, just dump all of the above ingredients into a bowl, mix well and put into a lidded container of choice. I often use tiny mason jars, but if you don't want to have glass in your bathroom, plastic containers can be found that are also very cute.
1 tsp Biryani Masala Powder
Our group is unique in that we try to represent as many aspects of the Children's Market as we can. Each of us has interests in various aspects of it and we wanted to use our group and our blog to investigate those aspects and gather resources that have helped us and will help others.
The Nigerian security forces especially the State Security Services and the Directorate of Military Intelligence have shown rare professionalism in tracking and monitoring the sponsors of Boko Haram. The problem is that the number of high profile personalities involved is such that only a presidential order would close up the matter. The President is yet to give the much awaited orders because of fear or religious, ethnic and sectional twists and propaganda. In such cases you cannot blame the monitoring agencies when the authority to enforce is not appropriately delegated. The escapist option is to blame the opposition parties.
How would your life change if you won $5 million in the lottery?
As the American Declaration of Independence clearly states, when in the course of human events it becomes necessary for people to band together and collectively declare their rights and responsibilities to which the laws of nature and nature’s God entitle and bind them, a decent respect to the opinions of mankind requires that they should disclose the causes which impel them to such.
So my treat to myself for this birthday is to feel sorry for myself. Don't worry, I'll get over it.
You can still enter as many challenges as you like, I know some folk limit the number of challenges you can do, but we aren't doing that. Hope that sounds fair to you all. . . Many thanks, xx
Oh,… the top 1% of the top 1% club,… that’s right.
These are bentos I made before the holiday.
I feasted on her breasts, then rubbed her wet nipples, watching her eyes narrow and her mouth open, and I rolled her off of me so that I could kiss her from her lips, her neck, her tits, her belly, and finally down to kiss the mounded denim between her legs and take in the musky scent. “I want this,” I said, and unbuttoned, unzipped, and wiggled her jeans off of her. I kissed the mound of her cunt, and nipped at her pussy through her panties before I tugged those off of her too, and put my lips on the soft patch of pubic hair and breathed in. I tasted her skin where the mound tucks into a valley to meet the thigh. I put my tongue to the softening crack of her pussy and tasted her first wet, salty, sour emissions. I licked her lips inside and out, and sucked her clit, holding it firmly between my lips and flicking it with my tongue until she humped at my face and gasped, “Oh shit Theo shit Theo shit Theo….”
We took the commuter train into Boston (there is a subway system – the ‘T’ - but we would have had to drive further in to find that). The commuter train was like something out of an old movie – dusty and huge (we practically had to climb a ladder to get into it). The conductors work in a kind of charming old-school way too (they call out each station, you can’t get off without telling them…). We didn’t travel during rush hour of course.
Although they are prevalent in many foods, fresh meats and dairy products are the best sources for most of the B vitamins. Cobalamin is only found naturally in animal source foods.
You can’t be a Zombie if you’re not taken from the grave within three days, which is why Haitians watch their friends’ graces for that period.
I had a really busy weekend. I watched grand kids Rhianna and Joe while their parents went on a mini holiday by themselves!
In closing, if you’re looking for an addition to your 2012 marketing or to increase client event ROI success, I’d recommend considering these events. If you have questions, don’t hesitate to call or email me. Thanks for all you do and advise with passion.
Years later they are just a part of life now and I couldn't imagine going back to plastic. I find I can pack a whole lot of groceries in them without the fear of the bag breaking and they don't cut into my hands.
The 10-yr-old who thinks I have 5 husbands listened really quietly while I recorded her piece (rhythm...rhythm...rhythm...), then said "So, when you send me the recording, could I ask, could you send me a photo of your earrings as well? We're doing nature shapes in art and I want to draw your earrings. They're so pretty". Then the next child also said how pretty my earrings were, then said she loved my stockings (incidentally, she had her best lesson in ages today).
Entrapped am I, in inside what, I don’t know, what.
FMF Racing founder and owner, Don Emler, had a simple vision for the company when he started it in his garage back in 1973: Provide top-level U.S. racing equipment at the grassroots level. Thirty nine years later, FMF racing is known for delivering the world’s top performance exhaust products, as well as premium custom apparel for the entire motorsports market, which includes all of its enthusiasts and fans. From Supercross, Motocross, Off-Road, Endurocross, FMX & Freeriding, all the way to Streetbike & Pavement Racing. Don’s vision continues to guide the family operated company, which has expanded into a 90,000 square foot state-of-the-art design and manufacturing facility in the heart of Los Angeles, CA. FMF houses the world’s best design and production teams in the U.S.A. under one roof.
Preheat oven to 400 degrees. Remove the chops and garlic from the marinade. Place the chops in a cast iron skillet over medium high heat. Brown for 3 minutes per side. Add the garlic, and bake for 10 minutes.
I braked like crazy but it wasn't enough cos then there was an almighty bang and the front of my car was crumpled, like it was made of paper. I sat stunned for all of 10 seconds, then asked Derek if he was all right and got out of the car.
There have traditionally been a lot more jobs downtown than residents living there, and one of the new secondary plan’s “big ideas” is to foster more of a balance, said David de Groot, a city hall urban designer. Guelph’s growth target is 8,500 residents and 7,500 jobs in the core by 2031.
We just had a launch party for our book, Zombie Housewives of the Apocalypse. Sharon brought Clive along and he seemed to have a pretty good time. I think this zombie half-man statue had way to much fun. Check him out:
Best Actress in a Movie or Mini-Series
Rating – 8.5/10
Ribbons
our troubles are all the same
doing daring things..
Pensioners and homeowners have more in common than they might realize. In fact they might even be the same person. Someone whose pension funds are going down because of losses on mortgage bonds in their pension fund and someone who is losing their house in foreclosure because of the decrease in pension income and trickery used by the Banks in securing their signature in bogus loan deals. Many pensioners are going to hear soon that the benefits they were expecting must be reduced because of chicanery on Wall Street. Some of those same people are angry at the thought of providing relief to homeowners who were also tricked into these bogus loan deals. Now that you see the effect, are still sure that borrowers in distress are deadbeats?
Be sure to visit the Cheery Lynn Designs Challenge blog for more inspiration. The challenge this week is Think Spring. You can enter for a chance to win a $20 coupon for shopping at the Cheery Lynn website.
In keeping with this change, I wanted to write a book that would reflect my new relationship with the kata I’ve chosen to make my own. Rather than writing one poem for each kata, I’ve written new poems for each line of the original kata poem, and tied the writing of those poems to my daily study of particular techniques and sequences in the kata. (117)
With love, Paula
born: 3/27/1741
As for small happenings, Kira had her musical program tonight! Only Ben and I made it, which really disappointed her! She sobbed before we came, for about ten minutes! Then she kept watching the door. I felt bad for her! Then she started crying in the last song, because Ben was giving her the "boooo" sign! Good grief! I was working so hard to film everything to show Scott and his mom when they got here that I hadn't noticed! Poor Kira! She was already emotional! She did a great job though! It was eight songs, straight in a row, with no words! I'm impressed!
So, on Saturday Michael and I got up bright and early and headed to the ball field to play in the annual co-ed softball tournament hosted by our local Little League. When I first heard about it a couple months ago, I impulsively said, “Yeah! Let’s do it!” It sounded like fun, but in all honesty, the closer we got to the actual date, the more I started kicking myself. I’ve never been athletic – though I grew up climbing trees and playing street baseball with my brothers and the neighborhood kids, at heart I’m a graceless, awkward nerd who gets terrible stage fright at the prospect of being center stage. Plus, it’s been years – decades! – since I actually played any baseball. I was so nervous in the days leading up to the softball tournament that I even had a dream a couple nights before that I showed up to the ball field in my slippers and humiliated myself!
6. Taurus (Williams)
Today, anyway.
In a lean economy, government must ensure that essential education needs are met. Open budgets need to be scrutinized and seriously discussed by all who will be affected. Tough choices need to be handled wisely. David Karaffa, Kurt Michael and Marshall Pattie, along with sitting supervisor Tracy Pyles, will spend the time it takes to work with the school board, educators and the taxpayers to make the process clear and understandable.
The lily pad was cut using my gypsy at 3.09" width 1.94" height. The frog only has two layers, the main body and the belly layer.
You can now identify the dog, cat, fish, duck and pig magnets (we tell you which one to pick, and you grab it and bring it to us:) You also can identify your mouth, nose, eyes and ears. Yesterday, on the way home from daycare, you were pointing these body parts out on your doll as I called them out!
Size : 18" wide x 21" long
The personal health of the director shalt be besieged; her teeth, her eyeballs, and her hypertension being not spared. The good friend of the script supervisor shalt be persuaded that deciding to marry and planning a wedding shouldst both be done in less than a month, and the date must conflict with the busiest scheduled day of shooting. The relative of the Assistant Camera shalt be made due to purge her offspring from her womb.
Offended by President Obama's decision to force health insurers to pay for contraception and surgical sterilization? It gets worse: In the future, thanks to ObamaCare, the government will issue such health edicts on a routine basis—and largely insulated from public view. This goes beyond contraception to cancer screenings, the use of common drugs like aspirin, and much more.
Or an eagle.
Another day I took Jamie and my dad on the Crouching Lion hike. The trailhead is impossible to find but somehow we did (look for the pink/orange markers and go straight into the jungle). From there you climb the ridge line of the mountain. Having cliffs to each side of you makes for a thrilling trek while the view catches your breath. We went as far as we could until we thought the wind would bulldoze us to our deaths. My dad was a trooper. His shoes had no traction and I thought he might slip ...or have a heart attack. Speaking of death, Jam and I got caught in a riptide. That was scary for a second but we got out of it before the lifeguards had to come get us. Sort of...
Sunday, April 14th, dawned bright and clear. It looked as if we were in for another very pleasant day. I spent most of that day walking around the decks with my mother and father. We had short chats with many of the other promenaders, among whom I particularly remember J. Bruce Ismay, chairman of the board and managing director of the Oceanic Steam Navigation Company, Limited, owners of the White Star Line; Thomas Andrews, one of the ship’s designers and Charles M. Hays, who was President of the Grand Trunk Railway of Canada; with all of whom we spent quite a lot of time.
More opinion from me: Out of the 33 games that David played for the Twins in 1984, only two were as a designated hitter. Perhaps it should say "OF-DH"?
public apologies. A goodly portion of those reparations will come from
It's becoming increasingly clear to me that the fashion world runs on pretty much the same uninspired principle.
"The problem isn’t what she is doing," Dr. Nestle said. "Plenty of people eat that way all the time and consider it healthy and normal. Her choice of words makes it easy to misread and mis-translate her remarks as suggestive of eating disorders, food addictions, and other unhealthy relationships with food, which don’t really seem to be there."
1 x PP056 / F / air = 25.00
The full wage must be paid.
CR: Yeah, indeed there is a sentence I say all the time when things go wrong, and the funny thing is I actually say it in english. It's "Life is a bitch, but still, it's life!" :)
Back to me. I got in and out of the bathroom in record time and walked (I wasn’t dumb enough to try to run; I didn’t want to fall after all) as fast as I could back to the theater. I was relieved to see that the lights were still on, but worried that they would go off any second. I dashed up the stairs to my row and turned to navigate through all the people to get back to my seat. My mom still had an expression of horror and started to say something about how she had been sure I was going to fall on my ill-advised dash up the stairs as I got near her. I started to laugh at her unnecessary worry just as I went around her knees and stepped on the freshly mopped area of floor in front of my seat.
Public outrage was very evident when Adur council bulldozed the majority of Mash Barn Lane in October 2011 and a contractor instructed by BHAFC caused further destruction in November 2011. Private property was damaged and / or destroyed at these times with no thought for the people of Barfield Park and Daniel Close who were affected by the unannounced works.
NISHI K, MIZUGUCHI M, UEDA A. Effectiveness of influenza vaccine in health-care workers. Kansenshogaku Zasshi - Journal of the Japanese Association for Infectious Diseases 2001; 75: 851-855.
The Carpenters
my mind to laugh, to take it
Hope everyone had a nice Thanksgiving. The first one I was able to enjoy, and didn't have to be at work at 4am!
“With microRNA, after a heart attack you can simply convert some of the fibroblasts and tell them to become the right cell type and regenerate,” he said.
Practical Parsimoney suggested a greenhouse or more shelves for food storage. If there is a corner of your cellar that can be used for cold room or root cellar storage this would be a great investment to make in your home. The idea of short term food storage is to preserve summer bounty for winter lean times. Some years when I have done this I have only needed to buy dairy and cleaning products during the winter. Money is tighter in the winter;especially when folks pay for higher utility bills or if business is seasonal; which it is in this part of Maine. I would add that if this is your goal it is worth the investment in a CSA Share to supplement what your garden produces. Short of a CSA share I would save some extra funds for pick your own produce. Around here we have strawberries, blueberries and apple picking. I also buy corn for the freezer, extra bulk potatoes. There are some great plans online for building your own root cellar. This is a good book for for covering all the bases of root cellaring. If you do not have the funds or skills for using a green house building cold frames will help you to extend your growing season; providing greens for you during the cold winter months.
1 bowling pin
We’ve talked adoption for years, her more so than I. A series of events starting late 2010/early 2011 resulted in Steph and me starting the adoption path, and I feel that through many prayers and moments that this was our correct path. While a second child seems insane at this moment, maybe it won’t in a year, and whether it’s because he’s lit the next path, or blessed me with an optimist mind, it’ll be a path that we forge together.
This template below shows you how to cut and score your cardstock:
Fannie also built in new stipulations for repurchase requests. As of May 1, PHH could have its contract with the GSE severed if 30% of its buyback requests went without action for more than 180 days.
Otherwise known as, It's All Part of the Plan...
By DOROTHY SAMUELS
“Um…” she began cautiously. “Do you guys know what you’re hauling?”
In Amsterdam, Netherlands a few days ago, I was informed that a massive post-Soviet Ponzi investment scheme that ended disastrously in 1994 (MMM) has been revived after its creator has been released from prison. He has adapted his approach to fit the internet/information/knowledge economy age and has been evading lawmakers and banks through entangling them in involvement or masterfully using statutes of limitation. This is a rough take of what was disseminated to me, in the form of a video through my YouTube channel, but which is only available to readers here:
It sits on a gently sweeping bend in the road and shares the local landscape with Myrniong Primary School #487. Apart from the sprawling farms and cosy houses nestled into the hills there is not much else in town but the Plough and the school. Serving dinner from Thursday to Saturday with lunch a few days a week it is rarely anything but filled with people enjoying convivial company, a wide range of beer with four taps and plenty more in the fridge and food worth travelling great distances for.
Virginia Woolf
Overt self-promotion:
The nature of the physical suffering shown in the paintings has been seen as controversial.
it eats on unaware!
maybe make the biggest family in 11th grade.
The Art Collective, a venture supporting young and emerging artists, comes to Brighton for a two-week exhibition. Work from artists Lance Hewison, Gina Hart plus photographer Celine Marchbank and many more will be on display for you to buy, including a special range of signed editions. Nice and local, no reason not to!
Jeffers and Horrocks in a duo drawing presentation clearly enjoyed themselves while at the same time hugely entertaining all fortunate enough to be present.
Oh and his wife was suddenly 4 stone heavier and had severe - O so severe - acne due to hormones!
I strive
as your heart
Than I think I am
Until he saves it. Again.
Phillis Rose
This is the reality that many consumers and purveyors of adult beverages face from Utah's favorite socialized industry.
I've said 'hi' in the past, when I've been a little more able bodied as I passed, but yesterday, he chose to engage in a conversation.
South-west district police chief Supt Mohd Hatta Mohd Zin, when contacted, said police were investigating the case under section 13 of the Anti-Human Trafficking Act 2007.
“Something about a snake… and it’s gray”, said Bantum earnestly to Ibis. Everyone else hung their shoulders and shook their heads looking at the ground. It was definitely starting out as one of those days.
Susan M. Getzendanner, 57, New York, N.Y.
pall of night
1) He has no emotional connection with the Creation. It is only meant for amusement purpose.
However, although African Americans may be skeptical of putting their trusts in the hands of the same class of doctors and researchers that may have once deceived their ancestors, taking a leap of faith into clinical studies may be their only chances for treating their life-threatening illnesses that may otherwise go untreated.
Wildlife is not abundant, but if you stand still and wait things become clearer. On the edge of the forest a single Crimson Rosella sits in the snow, claiming scraps from a picnic. From a distance it looks like the ground is bleeding. The white of the snow seems to cut back all shades with its reflected light. But under the trees there is a change; even the snow looks green, from the reflection of the leaves. Looking back out from the trees to the open land the snow seems grey, but when you arrive there it looks blue. A single eucalyptus leaf sits on the snow, and in the lea side shelter of rock, moss and ferns push through the snow. Ice coats the base of the trees, fingering its way along lines of bark. Under the trees there are far fewer footprints - the myth of the deep, dark forest, that will baffle and confuse, seem to be alive and well.
She helps us be more responsible wives and keepers at home. She talks about the roles we have been created for as wives. She lets us know that we are not perfect, but we serve a perfect God who guides us in being a helpmeet and keeper at home.
I fished out Chloe's 12 Days of Christmas gift for the day, the latest issue of Shojo Beat (a manga magazine). She was thrilled! And then she was gone, happily reading away with only the occasional excited outburst. "Movies, Mom! Of some of the manga I read!"
” We are quite sure that we do our best to provide a ceasefire in Syria and support Annan’s plan because the situation is not stable there, as provocative powers should be eliminated and international observers will go to Syria and it is supposed to maintain their security, a thing it is consulting with other experts about,” Lavrov said.
I began designing pieces soon after I began stitching. I started experimenting with stitches and colors, which I continue doing today.
“You bloody cocksuckers!” Sid yelled, his eyes pinned to the rear view mirror. “They found us, Johnny.”
Based on the above, the best current investment plan is to drink heavily & recycle.
While we were at it, I was curious to see how my White Oak Porter was coming around. I siphoned off a taste for Dave and myself. Definite vanilla oaky aromas and I could taste them as a more subtle flavor in the beer. Makes me proud to think that my goal when I made it will turn out as planned.
I want to raise kids who think positive and are grateful, but how can I do that when they hear me complaining all the time. Because as adults we always worry if we are giving our kids enough and look at what other moms or families have or the things they do. I know this is especially true in the blogging world. I read some blogs and get sad because my house doesn't look like a pottery barn catalog and I can't do tons of awesome crafts, but we all only share part of our lives and usually it's the best parts. I know these are not things my kids are worried about though all they want is me and it takes so little to make them happy just my time and attention. Sometimes I get caught up in the everyday life and truly forget how lucky I am, but now I have been trying to slow down in those stressful moments and realize that most of the things I stress about really are not a big deal(so what if the house is a mess, if we are five minutes late, everyone is crying) As long as I am doing me best and my family is healthy and happy all the other stuff seems so small
In a previous iteration of this query, you mention Amanda is 14. That also puts it at middle grade. Young readers read up: they read books about kids slightly older than they are. Thus your audience is 10-13.
As I’ve mentioned before, I have been much taken with the teachings of an entity who presents himself as St. Stephen the Martyr, as published by Michael Cocks, who was involved with a group that communicated with that entity in the 1970s. I had shared some parts of that work with Mendy Lou Blackburn, who was equally enthusiastic. When I visited her late last December, we talked about one of St. Stephen’s messages, not trying to evoke his presence in any way. Suddenly, there he was– or there was someone who wanted us to believe that.
Teaching isn’t about how boring or how exciting a class is. No, it’s about growing and changing.
"Hugh Masekela - Waiting For The Rain-1985 Botswana":
North Central West Virginia includes cities such as Morgantown, Fairmont, and Clarksburg. Interstate 79 runs right past those three cities. If you want to see the true Pepperoni Roll Capitol of the World, you would get off Exit 132 at Fairmont, also home of gymnast Mary Lou Retton and me, a mediocre blogger.
Jose Bienvenido Gomez, 45, New York, N.Y.
But mostly it was the fact that some one that I adore and who knows my body’s sexual responses as well as her own, was totally into what she was doing to me and I was totally into having it done.
1 ~ Do I need a "host/hostess"?
when she got old
As with the other witnesses, a more detailed examination of maters might have pinned the witness down clearly and unequivocally. However, as with Mr Bonds, the “killer questions” were not asked, giving the person responding legitimate room for manoeuvre in their response.
12. Intro's
That all I’m able to do
And now if you'll excuse me, I have a very beautiful little girl to talk to....
I came up, aided by many different ideas I found online and from friends, with a list of some things to do in the winter. I'm calling it a Winter Bucket List, and with it, I'll show you how to make a cute altered clipboard to display it on.
28.- Mother to be kind.
The strategy seems to be an attempt to provide the media and the population with even more interesting talking points, so that the Uff Report slips into obscurity. I expect that if the incumbent party is returned to office, there will be attempts to claim that the ‘mandate’ granted by that vote is a justification for the matters revealed in the Uff Report. Already a large slice of attention has been shifted to the impending elections, as expected.
However, it’s a hard bread that reminds me of ciabatta and baguette at once. And it’s filled with chocolate. That’s not all. It also got a fine note of black pepper in it! First I was irritated to be honest, because I had no idea and wasn’t expecting pepper in a chocolate bread. Now though, I crave it regularly. Haha!
You bullocks, crowned with garlands, stand at the full trough,
On another topic I had a good chat with my mate Carrie tonight, we don’t do it often yet it’s lovely when we do eventually catch up!
13. You Are The Everything
Neither is it on the poor in mind; for mental poverty is not necessarily a state of blessedness, and ignorance is certainly not bliss, nor is it desirable.
Good evening all! Wow, lots of food today! I am down 4.5 pounds so far! I felt really good and I felt like my old energy is back.
Shopaholic series by Sophie Kinsella
When the moon is low,
TAKE NOTE: The following extracts of this book were sourced from the Smashwords edition, where approximately 20 percent of the content can be viewed for free. Because Smashwords does not deliver the content in print form, but in various digital formats – the extracts I’ve published here will thus not reference any page numbers.
So talk to me and look for me,
I have emailed drug manufacturer's for coupons, only found one and that is one I no longer take, there are no funds for people in my situation because of the economy, and disability is at least a one year process. Even though in my day, I paid more in taxes every year than the average middle american family makes..
Not just in religion and science but in all aspects of life.
So if you are a parent, teacher, youth leader, grandma, aunt, or neighbor of a teen, this may be the time to yank the earbuds off that teen you know and direct them to DoSomething.org. All campaigns have deadlines, but summer campaigns run even when school doesn't.
"Art owes its origin to Nature herself... this beautiful creation, the world, supplied the first model, while the original teacher was that divine intelligence which has not only made us superior to the other animals, but like God Himself, if I may venture to say it."
It is not affiliated to the city or the province's fire services.
Between that and the free beer it was probably the highlight of my 2011.
3. There was boot washed up on shore. How often does that happen?! If I had gone fishing last week there’s a chance that I could have caught it. I think that would have been quite exciting. Perhaps I’m the only one, but when something from a cartoon happens in real life, I find it incredibly exciting.
2. Up With The Lark
“I knew it! Totally knew it from the second I saw you at his apartment!” Aisha cackled.
I am very excited that we both have families that dont mind getting together all at once! I hope it remains that way in the future, because it sure makes it easier!
Here's that section a little closer. I may move that plastic bin if needed later, but for now it has puzzles in it. Calvin can't see them, which actually is great because then he thinks I'm awesome when I get them down for him to play with. Keeps the novelty to not see them for awhile.
Tim Holtz Distress Inks - Broken China, Peeled Pain, Walnut Stain
Rom 7:24 O wretched man that I am! who shall deliver me from the body of this death? Rom 7:25 I thank God through Jesus Christ our Lord. So then with the mind I myself serve the law of God; but with the flesh the law of sin.
Encourage employees to solve their own problems and assist them when critical issues arise.
This was the group
In HOD Beyond this week the younger girls learned about Johnny Appleseed.
My favorite head scarve is disintegrating. My guitar strings are wasting away. The tires on my car are balding. My hair dryer is close to combusting into flames. CLEARLY, material things are not good investments. Even the best of investments on earth are left behind when we close our eyes for the last time. In light of this, what will we do with our lives? What will we do in light of the coming of Christ and His Kingdom and all of those who do not know His grace?
Life goes on. Mildred hangs up her black dress and drives to a poultry farm to haggle over chickens prior to the restaurant opening. Then she shops for herbs and vegetables and gets some cash from the bank. Three scenes that I feel we really, really didn’t need. Can we get the story going here?
Sukke is a Konkani preparation of vegetables - a stir fry with spices which have a coconut and tamarind base. One of my favourites of Konkani cuisine - something I got acquainted with at my best friend's house when I was in college. I practically lived there when I was doing my post graduation - it was like coming home when I went over there on the weekends. And definitely the food was such a relief from the terrible hostel food and then our own cooking when I was living in a flat with 4 other girls.
Occasionally, not.
four closest relatives, and who purveyed
We began "going steady" as Sophomores in High School.
The State Dinner honoring UK Prime Minister David Cameron is a perfect example: The entree was Bison Wellington. Comerford transformed the classical British 19th century beef-in-puff-pastry dish by using North Dakota bison tenderloin as the main ingredient, which the White House described as "a perfect pairing of US and UK cultures."
I liked the more natural look of the twigs since the brown matches the bedding/crib. I added the mini-orbs to fill it in since I only ordered 6 birds (I would recommend 8 for this project). I got the orbs from JustArtifacts.com.
I started blaming God, for what was happening in my life, I would pray and look for Him, but I yelled and cried and started to doubt the fact that He would indeed exist. It’s so much easier to blame someone else for your unhappiness or even more doubt that He even exist.
Barisan Progresif Sdn Bhd and Semangat Progresif (M) Sdn Bhd !
This methodology builds on economic theory and takes as a starting point the unexplained annual change in unfulfilled demand for legitimate product—the decreased quantity of goods sold which could not be explained retrospectively by company-specific supply chain factors, industrial issues, or other market shocks. This figure is aggregated with institutional, economic, and social indicators in order to determine the factor that is highly correlated to counterfeiting and piracy. The approach is in keeping with Rand's interdisciplinary and quantitative problem-solving philosophy, translating theoretical concepts from formal economics and the hard sciences into novel applications in other areas.
Five miles from home I got a text from Rachel telling me to hurry because she was starving. "Good" I thought...not 'good' that she was starving but 'good' that she would be joining us. Her company is always welcome.
14. Volunteerism: Use volunteer opportunities to educate your children, not just about being a servant to others, but about life, choices, and even perhaps a trade. Habitat for Humanity allows older children to help. Most clothes closets and food pantries will accept help organizing, collecting, and distributing products. Nearly anyone can stuff bags with Bibles, toiletries, and candy to be sent overseas to soldiers. Older students can read aloud to the elderly or to young students. All of this valuable education is free, and priceless.
Speaking of new additions to my RC collection, Dustin pulled this from the massive group of stuff for sale and I decided I had to have it for $13. The centering's a bit off and it's somewhat worn but is otherwise in nice shape and is easily one of the best cards I came home with Sunday. Pudge was obviously an outstanding player, but Cooper, who gets the center spot here, was a pretty good player in his own right, and actually compares best to Don Mattingly. Neither guy deserves to be in the Hall, but they both had nice careers, so Cooper doesn't feel out of place on Fisk's RC here.
From my vantage point, about 100,000 people attended the rally in Kuala Lumpur. According to Bersih, which had the benefit of observers in all the areas of Kuala Lumpur where the crowds converged, it was as large as 250,000 people. By any yardstick, this was a fantastic turnout, and Bersih must be congratulated for a grand job. A special tribute to brave and cool Ambiga, as the very acceptable face of Bersih.
1) Love this one by Zig Ziglar… “Discipline yourself to do the things you need to do when you need to do them, and the day will come when you will be able to do the things you want to do when you want to do them”. *Such a great reminder about the importance of self discipline! ~ Katie Frieling
Shit, it's two weeks since my last post. My sense of time has been totally warped. On the one hand, time is flying by because Dani and I have been doing so much. There's something magical about the change from Winter to Spring. Um...alright, actually, there isn't. It's just warmer so going out and doing things becomes more attractive.
Authors also have the option of hardback binding, colour insertings, coloured endpapers and volume discounts. They also provide the following other services:
Anyway, I then found a spare bit from the last broken blind that I had carefully put in my man-drawer and thus was exactly the bit I needed (in your FACE McIntyre) so I could in fact mend the original blind, which is now back up until it falls down again, at which point we have all the stuff we need to put the new curtains up, although it looks like I might need a new Phillips head screwdriver.
2.) A tradition has a set syllabus. You’re learning things in a tried and true order which gives you the best experience of learning what can be powerful, difficult and confusing material. In an established tradition people have worked on the syllabus over time and have refined it. They can help direct you toward your goals and give you the tools you need to search on your own.
I fell in love with this catchy tune from the moment I heard it, and had to share it with all of you! It's the perfect "end of Summer" song.
street fires &
The warrior Thor is cast out of the fantastic realm of Asgard by his father Odin for his arrogance and sent to Earth to live among humans. Falling in love with scientist Jane Foster teaches Thor much-needed lessons, and his new-found strength comes into play as a villain from his homeland sends dark forces toward Earth. — IMDB
My grandfather was a writer.
It is another friends birthday tomorrow and I have made her something that I actually really like and havent given it a 'tat' title, will post it after she has seen it so if you would like to see it please visit my blog soon x
2. Emo is not short for emotional. Emo does not mean Taking Back Sunday and Dashboard Confessional, despite what MTV has led you to believe. Emo is not sidebangs, tight pants, and male vocalists who sing like little girls about their failed relationships. Emo is not the use of diluted, meaningless metaphors and similes such as “My arms are like pinecones,” and most definitely it is not the rampant use of words such as “heart,” “knife,” and “bleeding.”
I have this problem of not being able to watch TV without doing something else at the same time. In fact, if I don’t have a project in my hands, that little hourglass that shows up on my computer screen when it’s waiting for something to load floats around in the air and taunts me for putting my real life on hold! But Dave and I do have a few favorite shows, so making these little 3 x 3 pillow ornaments is my new TV activity.
Brent was home from work today and we had a blast as a family. His mom, sister and grandparents came over for a visit and the kids were thrilled to see them... and not just because they came bearing gifts, which they did.
“Oregon officials were successful in getting permission to kill sea lions that feed on protected salmon trying to swim upriver to spawn. Now they want federal approval to shoot a sea bird that eats millions of baby salmon trying to reach the ocean. In an April 5 letter to the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service obtained by The Associated Press, Oregon Wildlife Chief Ron Anglin says harassment has “proved insufficient” in controlling double-crested cormorants, and officials want the option of killing some of the birds. Oregon needs federal approval to start shooting double-breasted cormorants because the birds are protected under the Migratory Bird Treaty Act. Anglin wrote that the birds are threatening restoration of wild fish protected by the Endangered Species Act, as well as hatchery fish important to sport and commercial fishing.
4 – I can’t wait to tell my friends!
i could have shared with her
I want to take her to the park and lay in the grass. Talk about random things and just feel good about life.
Paul’s list of fifteen acts of the sinful nature can be divided into four categories: (1) illicit sex, (2) religious heresy, (3) social conflict and (4) drunkenness.
“After just one shot yesterday?” she asked incredulously.
I am hoping to get lots done .. we shall see ....
R8-17: Sc 42.
1-1/2 cups apple cider vinegar
did anyone with half a brain expect otherwise? Why
Sarah, Collin and Mason came up from Flagstaff to spend a couple weeks here
Saameira: Yes, Maisa?
Just because they were both muggleborn.’
What the Bible teaches is that we pray in the Name of Our Lord and Saviour JESUS CHRIST, for that’s the
It's a well known fact that there isn't a spending program that Democrats can really say they hate. They want to spread your dollars out everywhere so they can buy themselves votes. You work hard, you come home tired, you still have to do things around the house, you go to bed, and get up just to do the same thing all over again....just so you can pay for programs like the one Harry Reid is describing in this short clip:
Moderator: Brian Cogan (Molloy College)
Ducommun was also a political figure of some consequence. In Bern he was a member of the Grand Council for ten years; in Geneva, prior to his leaving in 1865, he was a member of the Grand Council for nine years, becoming vice-chancellor in 1857 and chancellor of state of Geneva in 1862.
By the way - for all of you ladies with severe endo like I have - you have to try cataflam. It works amazingly well. Of course, if you are sensitive to NSAIDS like I am you will think you are having a heart attack when the acid reflux kicks in, so you have to pick your poison. Hence the alcohol. I'd rather deal with the wine hangover than the severe chest pain for days.
GROSS!!! When I found it it was filled with bars of gifted soap too... seriously when I got to cleaning out my laudry room I probably would have thrown this to goodwill...that is if it weren't for trash to treasure tuesdays! I knew just what to do with it when I saw it... a little spray paint I had, a look through the box of drawer pulls and a glue dot and this is what I have:
Yes, you read that right. A lace pattern. Because I did not have enough time to finish the socks and hats I had already planned. Why not add more?
As I was thinking about this the other day I was reminded of President Wilford Woodruff’s experiences when he was young. Often, when referring to President Woodruff, we speak of The Manifesto which ended the practice of plural marriage in the Church, or we talk about his meticulous journal keeping. As prophet he not only saw the Church through some of the most difficult of trying times, but he also led the Saints through jubilation as the Salt Lake Temple was finally dedicated and as Utah became a State. That he was a man raised up of God with a mission and purpose is without doubt for those who have studied his great life. And nowhere is that more evident than when you read his own account of his youth.
70%: The percentage of Australian prostitutes who said they would choose the same trade if they had their lives to live over again.
In a sense, I discovered the cask version at home. It's home.
These children, so naïve,
I also have the gift of the gab! I can talk with enthusiasm and passion about pretty much anything! I find once you are passionate about what you are presenting or talking about it automatically engages your audience.
Uncle Jack: "You know if I get the news that I have something terminal, I'm going to off myself on death day just to keep the statistics interesting."
Salman is very busy wrapping up Dabangg 2 and his associates are busy meeting with the car dealers to finalize the deal.
Let us listen initially to some reflections on the early days of Fascism by Mussolini himself -- first published in 1935 (See the third chapter in Greene, 1968).
We wouldn’t even let the moon get blue
"This agency," says Gell, "can be agonistic or defensive as well as
This is what I know, if I want results I'll have to chose to change each and every day, and it will be a series of daily choices only I can make, wouldn't it be nice if someone else could make these dietary changes for us, in a painless way. Sadly, changes never manifest when they are mere dreams and that is what I'm doing now. My reality...one day at a time.
“Responding to concerns voiced by privacy advocates, conservative groups and hundreds of thousands of Americans, the House Intelligence Committee has revised parts of the Cyber Intelligence Sharing and Protection Act, also known as CISPA.
(11) 8 2.4m wood stakes
It's just so blasted hot outside, y'all. No, not hot. SWELTERING. I mean, it was 101 degrees right before the sun went down. It's a mind melting inferno here.
But candy does not fit into the diet.
What do you think – is journalism enhanced by social media because of the breadth of contacts and availability of information? Or is it diluted because of the introduction of a medium? Give us your opinion below!
to her saviour pray?
This day of visiting one of my old haunts only reaffirms why I left Northern Virginia a decade ago. My schedule is one of my choosing. My life is filled with meaning and quality, nurturing images inspire me, while I am embraced by a supportive small town humanity.
I'd also like to enter this in the following challenges:
What kinds of logical consequences help you to stop nagging and yelling and encourage your kids to take responsibilities on for themselves?
In Hyatt v. Kappos, the applicant filed a mammoth application in 1995 ultimately containing 238 pages, 40 drawings, and 117 claims. The application claimed priority to a chain of applications dating back to 1975.
Although very localized, this native orchid is frequent throughout much of Florida, except the Florida Keys. Look for it in wet prairies, along river banks, edges of ponds, and sometimes even along roadside ditches. November is the best month to look for them.
Finally an American Pale Ale. Very smooth, good crisp hops. There is a great light biscuity flavor to go with the hops. I wish they ramped it up on the malt, but otherwise drinkable. 3 Stars.
I think I'll just make a simple Rogue's Gallery of the most pleasant moments shared while travelling.
Hmmm. I don’t know. So far I’ve only asked a stranger once and that was an off duty model at MV’s fashion walk. I feel nervous my legs turn to jelly and I stutter a sentence in which the stranger has to lean in and ask “sorry, what?” then with the craziest grin plastered on my face and baring my teeth (unintentionally, because I always grin when I am super nervous) I ask them again in a not so stuttery but still stuttery voice. Then I lift my camera to eye level and snapsnapsnap not even giving them time to compose themselves so all the pictures I have are comical unflattering ones of half blinking people with their mouths opened in an equally unflattering way. And in less than 30 seconds I’m still grinning maniacally, probably enough to scare the stranger away in a grinning-creep-just-took-a-bajillion-photos-of-me way. Then I’m left with a dozen of unflattering stranger photos.
For me Davey Jones was always the groovy one. Hey hey......always monkeying around...... Mr Jones R.I.P. I'm still a believer.
A quick sketch based upon words from the Kate Bush song Lily, about psychic protection. I feel I need some right now, hehe...
In a move of breathtaking audacity, the city has granted judges a new parking lot -- the Rose Walkway, the main thoroughfare of Borough Hall's Columbus Park -- while their controversial old one is renovated. From 6 a.m. till 7 p.m., armed guards stand behind fences, telling hundreds of puzzled pedestrians to beat it.
The above Verses clearly state that He (Allah) is Able to give victory to His worshippers (the believers) without fighting, but Allah wants from His worshippers obedience with all their efforts. As in His Statement:
Chicago and are essentially contemporary comedies. With Chronal Engine, I wanted to try something more of an action and adventure and had always had an interest in dinosaurs, so I figured that would be a good place to start.
5) Whisk ingredients (C) till stiff. Fold meringue into butter mixture from step 4 in a few batches till well-combined. Pour batter into greased and lined baking pan.
Oh how he boasts of this mighty feat! He is akin to a superhero taking on the might of the Supermarket (let's call it "Freschco's") and winning. He is known for never spending a penny. No, I don't mean like the Royal Family never spend a penny, I mean he is tight. Like a duck's posterior on water.
Someone came to the jetty every May. He was Simon, and his grandmother had lived in the pine cottage that had stood near the jetty, once. Simon came to paint the sea and the sea posed for him with crashing drama, because this was the one weekend a year it felt more a woman than a body of water.
Pins - you can NEVER have too many ;)
It's always a bit difficult to say goodbye to the bustling city life, but I happily rode my bicycle around Marugame and breathed the clean, crisp country air. Those small trips I often take are quite vital, and re-energize me in a way that I cannot explain. Lots of time spent alone in long bus rides and getting lost in a strange city is to me the best way to get re-acquainted with myself, and to never forget about my dreams.
Awfully proud of these guys!
I decided to compare how we used to eat with how we eat now using the 5 dinners in ONE hour plan. We used to eat at least 2 fast food dinners a week and I would cook or make frozen pizza the other nights. I know, not so healthy but that was reality.
But try to understand
He's going nuts...and? She finds out it's a one way ticket ...and? You need the choices and what's at stake for us to care about their situation.
"There has been widespread support within Norway for a closed trial, to deny Breivik the platform he appears to be seeking. Given the scale of what has happened there is unquestionably something obscene about the prospect of watching him expound his lunatic worldview to an international audience.
Don’t even get me started on bags, luggage and backpacks…
Sheren George-- Shot while in the car driven by her husband (Ross), as they tried flee from a mob of black youths beating a white man.
“Quiet now Alice.” Her mother said calmly. “You’ve been asleep for three days now. I found you outside the house, collapsed! It was after you got back from town on that blasted errand I could have probably run myself.”
"Let's be clear: insurance firms aren't altruists; they're capitalists. A rise in extreme weather means a fall in their profits. This is hardball economics based on risk analysis, not save-the-polar-bears stuff."
The cake cracked a whole lot on top and since im used to it now, i didnt panic. I turned it over and sliced it. hence the neat surface :)
[viii] Ludowyk, 1966: 5. I find the whole story quite puzzling. Deities are honoured with specific forms of music and a whole theory of pancaturyanāda (that is, sabda pūjā) elaborates on the value of religious music. Veneration via silence is contrary to this code.
I think that we are risking a wellness overdose, and there is no antidote. My concern is that it confuses the public between ways to improve their lifestyles and state of mind and actual medical care and treatment. I concede that many alternative medical treatments make folks feel better, but I’m not sure they cure disease. There’s a danger in medicine when faith overtakes reason. An extreme example is when cancer patients were spending precious time and resources for shark cartilage or other high cost alternatives that have no scientific basis. These opportunities exploit desperate people who have no way out. They shouldn’t have to spend money to pray for a miracle. They can do that for free, and they should.
She was four years old and a bit of a trouble maker but with the most charming and lovable personality.
And the entire ethical dilemma that surrounded the entire book that we’re having now. All about not enough organ donnors and overpopulation and so on. I thought it was a really interesting take on this issue which is in tons of debate right now. And all the problems that come with being unwound, like if you get a part of someone else’s brain, or if the other person had asthma. Or the fact that you can sometimes get the donor’s skills (that truck guy doing card tricks. Creepy as hell.)
Cast all your care upon me. (I Peter 5:7)
4) A grater
So instead- and since I've already shared a lot on this blog about Jim- I'm just going to jump right into a giveaway!!
I know Thanksgiving is a forgone thought in everyone’s minds now and you’re probably caught in the headlights of the Christmas highway already but to recap…we had a stupendous turkey day with my brother-in-law and his fam. Not only did this mean we had to do zero traveling over the holiday but it also meant that the food was guaranteed to be divine. My BIL (brother-in-law) could be a chef, should be, in fact and the Hubs and I are constantly harassing him on many occasions with questions in the midst of culinary chaos at home. For the grand feast we contributed the Italian sausage dressing and green beans in brown butter with oregano and pine nuts and the BIL prepared the heritage turkey with Marsala gravy, mashed potatoes with walnut oil, Hudson's on the Bend corn pudding, and of course, cranberry sauce. There were also homemade biscuits and yeast rolls. This is my plate before complete consumption. Burp.
When we arrived back at my apartment I had kind of a fuck it attitude. I realized that everything was out of my hands and there was nothing that I could do. Tomorrow would be another day. I tried my hardest to forget what I had just heard and just enjoy the moment. Sure, I acted like a fucking lunatic, but I was free…I was with my girl…pfffff lol…and I had my favorite carrot cake. It wasn’t so bad after all.
She is absolutely adorable... and nameless! Yes, the poor little gal doesn't have a name. We've considered Mademoiselle Katerina le Paws, and Amelia le Paws, Kat and Amelia respectively for short. Katerina, we just think is funny because her nickname would be Kat... with a "K," and Amelia because Frank proposed to me on Amelia Island. Le Paws is just going to be her "french" last name. You know, to make her sound fancy. :) She kept us up all night and is currently destroying every flower arrangement I have in the house. Adorable. Poor Frank is allergic to her, and said he would be fine as long as she didn't come in the bedroom. Then the crying started... er... wailing. Well, the sucker that I am was able to give her clearance into the bedroom, which of course eventually became the bed. Her love for Frank and his body heat showed throughout the night, as every time I woke up that she wasn't on my face, she was on his. Poor Frank. Of course, there was another "unfan" of our little gal. Our giant killer rabbit, Cadburry.
and continue cooking it over low heat, stirring constantly with a wooden spoon,
To start off this Flower Pot Box is perfect for Mother’s Day or any special occasion. The Flower Pot Box would make a great favor for showers or other spring parties! Pair it up with the coordinating card and you have a cheery combo sure to put a smile on anyone’s face! This project is also a quick and easy class, club, or camp project!
If that highboy were painted in a docile color, you wouldn't even notice it. And not just because of the intensity of the rest of the room, but because it wouldn't stand-up and demand your attention.
Let's take a look at what Brian sent my way. First up is the card responsible for this sudden change of heart:
1 red pen
* wreckage of a great ship: this is clearly about divorce and the percieved inequities of heartbreak. raw and honest. the wreckage of a good ship/you and your life jacket/i was holding on for dear life in my party dress/you're so put together/i'm on another planet/a planet now unsure of finding new oceans.
IF this works and I don't see evidence of bugs in the fridge I'll let you know so that you might want to consider this approach too ... I'll do the testing for you, your welcome :)
Given the nacho snafu, I was in major need of some comfort food to soothe my stomach tonight. I hit the jackpot with this Rachael Ray recipe for chicken and dumplings. Even though the ingredient list is a little longer than I usually like for a weeknight dinner, it’s easy to make with stuff that’s already in your fridge, and I made things even easier by picking up carrot and celery sticks from the grocery store salad bar. I was worried this would be bland, so I used a heavy hand with the salt, pepper, and poultry seasoning, which was a good call. Here’s the recipe:
will be revealed in a clearer picture.
Tip in turmeric powder and pour tamarind pulp. Add salt.
Add the eggs, one at a time. Then stir in the lemon extract and lemon zest. A note about lemon zest: Wash and dry your lemon well, then use a microplane to scrape off just the yellow part of the lemon peel. You don't want any of the bitter white part underneath.
You can serve it like this as a thick soup with the parathas to scoop it up or, if you want it thinner, add some more veg stock, that way it also serves more people.
Put the Air Grip at the top, with the Air Adaptor right below it, plastic cap off. Put the air hose with the small end below the air adaptor and the larger end near your aircan. Now all the parts look like they go together more like they will when you are done setting it up.
4. Routinely ask yourself “Who am I?” It’s an endless rabbit hole. Am I my name? No, that is simply a word—I would be me, even without that name. Am I my job? No, at this point I’ve been through enough careers to know that this too does not define me. Am I those I am in relationship to? Perhaps…and certainly I am shaped by them. And yet, there does seem to be a consistent core that moves from relationship to relationship. Am I my ideas? To some extent, yet ive experienced enough of a fluidity to those to know that the underlying person seems to remain consistent in the face of those shifts. So no…etc…etc..etc.. You get the point. This is a powerful spiritual practice if you give yourself to it. Of course a very similar exercise is asking “Who is God?” Now there’s a terrifying question. Try coming to the end of that path.
7. paint- Cheapest, easiest way to change the look of anything. I love paint in all forms and have a stock pile of it for all those future projects on my list.
IMDB: 4.7
Watching you grow and learn have brought me more happiness than could be summed up into simple words. From your first smile to the toddler streaking down Elbur Avenue, "The Great Lipstick Incident of 1995", wrapping your arms around Dad and I and calling us 'your guys' and reading Go Dog Go to me when you were 4 because you wanted to make me feel better when I had the flu, to the way we held each other the day your sister died, watching you succeed academically, socially and competitively, your strength of character, responsibility, amazing sense of humor and the way that you will want to correct this run on sentence and hand it back to me, all bring a smile to my face, a warmth in my heart and a pride of my daughter. These are all memories that I thank you for giving me and that I carry with me always.
I really wanted to include all the serifs in Antique Ruby, but quickly discovered that wasn't going to happen. You can see from my "A" that it didn't come off too well. Overall, I'm pretty happy with how this turned out, considering it's only my 3rd attempt at doing letters freestyle like this. Altho, I'm not so sure this is considered completely freestyle since I was trying to copy the feel of the fonts.
When she got back from her holidays, all she wanted to do was climb into bed and dream about all the men who’d she met over the past few days, all that they’s said and done to her – it was a good feeling, one she wanted to make last as long as she could until her next fix, But now instead she was greeted by a mother who had tears in her eyes, she gave her a look that told Anna she knew every part of her sordid life and the diaries, address books and open lap top told her all that she needed to know.
Well since then I have had a couple people tell me that they have been following my blog and it made me realize that it's not about that one person, or two or three, it's about me and sharing what I go through so other people don't feel alone, or shamed. That we all can feel like we are in this together because we are. We are all in this together, the good, the bad and the ugly.
In the morning, Emily woke to the sunshine coming through her window and noticed the icicles glittering like diamonds in the sunlight.
NO BULL TITLE: Inception… Except It’s a Book About Books (and Sexism and Politics and Psychology and…!) Instead of a Movie About Dreams
As I ponder these hard questions with no foreseeable answers I will try to remember that one time, seven years ago my dreams for surgery matched up with God’s plan for me to have that surgery. That’s God’s faithfulness #2.
That’s where I see Georgia State (and Georgia Southern, too, if it gets that far) playing into what Pennington suggests. By my count, thirty schools outside of Georgia signed kids from this state with three-star ratings in their 2012 classes, and they didn’t all sign with Alabama. There’s some hay to be made, particularly if Georgia Tech isn’t up to the harvesting.
For the cake, I made two 6-inch layers of chocolate cake, and filled it with strawberry whipped cream (since the birthday girl loves strawberry whipped cream!). For the frosting, I wanted to do a cream cheese frosting because I love the way it tastes, but after the cream cheese frosting mess from my Superman Birthday cake, I opted for a modified half cream cheese, half buttercream frosting which would stand up to the piping.
We played and played all day - with toys, with new games, and with each other.
Really it could be argued that the loss of freedom of speech is inevitable in democratic, equality obsessed, multiracial societies. As Helmut Schimdt said “The concept of multiculturalism is difficult to make fit with a democratic society”. So of course they simultaneously open the immigration flood gates and enact laws which undemocratically transform the society into an authoritarian one.
Orange is a colour that always seems to frequent during the warm seasons and admittedly it wasn't my cup of tea at first, I soon grew to love it. For this look, I've used a variety of orange hues but if you'd prefer to not look like a satsuma, perhaps stick to one or two features.
For the LORD shall be thy confidence, and shall keep thy foot from being taken.
Are there any normal, well-adjusted chicks in Rolling Stones songs? I can't think of any. But the woman who is the subject of "19th Nervous Breakdown" may take the cake. Looking for trouble? Then look no further -- you've found it.
what did you do last Wednesday. . ."
in our next encounter (waxing fast toward fullness,
It's difficult to believe that this layered tale began as a picture book. What was the original manuscript like and how did you know it was really a novel in disguise?
As I’ve written before, it is important to have a house in showing ready condition as we only have one chance to attract a buyer. However, it takes time to get a house in showing condition or “staged”. That is why a Seller may decide to sign a Listing Agreement with their agent as now the agent is working on the Seller’s behalf to not only help them get in “showing ready condition” but also starts working their network of contacts and prepares for marketing.
He Is Risen features a lily draped cross - a perfect image to celebrate Christ's resurrection each Easter. This illustration gorgeously drawn by Marcella Hawley not only features a beautiful cross but a single Easter Lily as well. This 4 by 6" set also features 5 beautiful sentiments perfect for this joyous religious holiday.
“Hey boy, come here.” The tall slinky man said.
One of the challenges on the MTC forum Christmas Challenges was to create some gift card holders. Well, I have quite a few different gift card holders already here on my blog. However, when I started looking, it didn't look like I had any or very few using MTC so I decided to take on that Challenge.
until
For people who complain ‘there is nothing to do” I am kind of dismissive. Between this university and others, you can go to SOMETHING almost every night.
CD 14: 4 mature, 4 fertilized
WINNER: DENISE
But what makes this comparison of photos really interesting to me is how the entire skirted console and framed picture from the first photo have been removed for the second.
The Hop will run 8am EST May 1 until 8pm EST May 2. The winners will be announced on the ODBD Blog on May 3. Three hoppers will be randomly selected to win ONE FREE SET of CHOICE, and One blessed hopper will win this month’s BREAD BASKET BUNDLE!!! Be sure to head over to the ODBD Blog for all the details on how to win!
“Suit yourself,” Lanigan laughed mirthlessly. “Mount up, everyone!”
Electro-shocking citizens is now a common practice for police departments around the country. In addition to non-violent people who do not pose a threat to the police, children, the elderly, students, the mentally handicapped and even wheelchair-bound people are now not only tasered on a regular basis, but also beaten, pepper sprayed and often killed. Infowars.com has posted hundreds of news stories documenting this now routine and mundane torture practice with “nonlethal” taser weapons.
Competition: Winchester Annual Writers, fee £5.00 - £7.00 , prize books, usefulness -you always get feedback
Being in a group of very talented and like minded ladies can only be a good thing! I hope I learn from the experience and maybe along the way share some of what I know and of course meet more new and fantastic friends!
I also stopped into a great little hospice shop that I was passing on my way back. As soon as I stepped in I felt like I was in some sort of ode to the Golden Girls with lots of older women shouting across the perfectly arranged shop (which seemed to be a house, with different departments in different rooms) saying things like 'Oh Rhohnda, whadda you getting today?' or 'oh, sweetie, those are selling like hawtcakes!' as I perused a couple of cute rainmacs. When I told one of the women browsing the same rack as me that I didn't know about this place but loved it already she just smiled and said 'oh, you'll be back', half like a threat but also like an invite to an exclusive party that happens every weekday and includes only those who are wise and over 50.
Interested in trekking through the Himalayas, catching views of striking mountains, checking out local schools and Sherpa villages AND benefiting the local communities where you’re traveling? Edge of Seven is running a trek this fall (Oct 21st-Nov 4th) in Nepal’s Everest Region. While the region is best known for its popular trekking villages and peaks, this trip will also visit a number of off the beaten path villages, monasteries, and humanitarian projects. It is often these sites that offer the most culturally rich perspective of the region. The trip will culminate in a visit to Edge of Seven’s Salleri Girls Hostel, a project completed in 2011 that enables 40 Nepali girls to achieve a higher secondary education.
Step 11. I'll show you now, how I like to hold my yarn. This is NOT the only way to do this, but it works for me... place the working yarn over your little finger as shown.
Hope you will like it.
Marriage is work. Relationships are work. Hard work. If you want one to last you have to invest the time and effort to make it last. You have to pour into it every ounce of your being. You have to not run out of the house with a packed suitcase when he leaves his shirt on the floor next to the bed for the millionth time even though you've asked him nicely each time to throw it in the hamper. (Not that I'm speaking from experience there ;) )
-purposely goes out of the way to frustrate others(*See ‘little boy syndrome’ above; ie. If he’s miserable, EVERYONE else has to be)
Like many cooking enthusiasts, I read cookbooks the way other people read novels. Some cookbooks are really fun to read this way, and one I especially remember was the New York Cookbook by Molly O'Neill which provided me with hours of entertainment back when I lived in NYC, although I never did cook anything from it.
Step 1: find a onesie or t-shirt to use
1-Leg pushups and jump: 5/7/6
Will you take the 31 day challenge with us?
Beth is that mom…
Future Plans
I tell the guards I didn’t do it, but they tell me that’s what people like us always say.
Another person in the online society offers his dog for a small commission.
It must be fairly noted here that ratification of the Treaty of Paris by the Senate was hotly contested. The newly-formed Anti-Imperialist league with champions like Mark Twain and Henry James bitterly opposed annexation. Senator George Frisbie Hoar said, "This Treaty will make us a vulgar, commonplace empire, controlling subject races and vassal states, in which one class must forever rule and other classes must forever obey." Andrew Carnegie was prepared to write the U.S. Treasury a check for $20 Million dollars to forget about the whole thing. Indeed, on February 4th, 1899, the treaty was two votes shy of the two-thirds majority needed to pass. But, that evening, the pot boiled over. American sentries encountered rogue rebel forces, and shots were fired. Though Aguinaldo looked for a cease-fire and to explain that the rebels had acted against orders, The Battle of Manila ensued on February 5th. On February 6th, the Treaty of Paris passed the Senate by only one vote. Two Senators had changed their vote in order to "support the troops" because fighting had begun.
R - Look out of the window at this bloody rain and tell me the world isn't ending! I got soaked on the way over today.
Here you see the second box, which was easier to put together. The black box in the bottom left of this picture is a box we've had for donkey's years - since we first had a home PC and Internet - back in 1998. This stored all our CD's in. Its been all round the house and lastly was in my sons bedroom. It's covered in dust (no surprise there) and had some of those original CD's in - plus some DK ones that my Dad collected years ago from the Daily Express (his choice of newspaper - not mine!). I'm going to give them to my mum as they are things such as the solar system, wildlife, dinosaurs etc etc. - that's if they work on more modern computers (not sure).... The best bit though is that I'm going to alter the box - which is something I'm looking forward to doing.
I wanted to be from somewhere
These are all fantastic challenges so be sure to stop by and play along with them. There is so much inspiration to see at each one!
"...everybody over-reports usage of Internet and mobile video and under-reports usage of traditional television." Hmm...where have we heard that before?
Even more shiny and some die-cut rookies:
If you find the job profile as per your needs then apply to pooja.Bhatt.del@sampoorna.com . If you feel that this job opening is unsuitable for your skill set or experience level please ignore this mail.
Justin “Biskit” Powell
Dear Builder,
For more great kids’ books about food and gardening, check out the sidebar on this blog compiling my ongoing series: YUM.
Oh and don't forget to stop over at Art by Karena, if you haven't already to check out my interview and be eligible for my crystal hurricane candle giveaway! Click here to visit.
The show isn't available in Canada, so I'm forced to share a YouTube playlist I've put together. All the episodes I could find, I've assembled here, with a few missing pieces. Just click on the "play all" button or pick an episode. Enjoy!
Right I'm off to make myself a coffee and eat a cupcake to celebrate!
Beauty is in everything. And, in a sense, love is too. And I think I'm concluding that a cartoon character opened my mind to both and handed me the tools to appreciate them at just the right age to become the person I am today.
Salt : as needed
Now this card was created for the daughters to give out - yep whilst doing everything else.. who was a good mum and was creating christmas cards.. and didn't send one out herself.. Yep you guessed it.. those hands are still waving in the air!
"The timing of the pedestrian signal meets the required standards," Mr. Aitchison said. "The amount of time is tailored to the specific intersection."
The First and Deputy First Ministers’ Office alone has eight special advisers, with the 11 remaining departments boasting one each. By comparison, Owen Paterson, a member of the UK cabinet, has a single Spad and Alex Salmond, the First Minister in Scotland, makes do with one part time adviser.
bouncing around the VIP suite, posing with posters.
Tonight as we were making a guest bed for the last time, he announced that there would be a reckoning when we got home. Ugh...if we both ever needed a reset now is the time. I'll at least admit that. I do wonder if he can spank the control monster out of me all at once or if it is going to take many, many spankings over multiple days. I guess I'll let you know over the next while. Upcoming spankings aside, I can't wait to be home!! I owe many of you replies to emails and comments on your posts. I'll do my best to catch up over the next couple of days.
Miike Snow definitely lived up to the hype surrounding them, and their live show demonstrated why they’ve gained such immediate popularity. The band is headed down to Coachella after this performance, and then continues on another ambitious tour with many dates across the world. Check their upcoming schedule and try to grab tickets early if they come to your town!
High grade lymphosarcoma of the intestine. I'm just stunned and sad and freaked the fuck out. He's my sweet baby, handsome mama's boy, my little fatty snuggle partner. He can't be sick. He just can't.
50s & 60s RnB, ROCK n ROLL, JUMP BLUES & SKA FLOOR FILLERS
Browne stepped out 3/4 through the movie to take a phone call, and during that time Nader showed up to prepare for his Q&A alongside the filmmakers, so after the call finished they greeted each other and chatted a long time. And other banal instances called me away from the floor, threatening my chances. But finally, I had an opportunity to speak to Browne, and as briefly as I could, explained my circumstance and gave him the DVD. He was intrigued, he didn't even know the movie existed. Telling him a little more, including how Tiffany was seeing Stills during the making and that Nash's wife Susan played the kidnap victim, he seemed to recall that Susan had once mentioned being in a movie with Phyllis, but no specific detail; I in turn theorized that Susan likely didn't say much else about the film because of the ordeal she suffered during the production, and because Phyllis did not share any scenes with her or with Tiffany. Clearly for Browne, this was the equivalent of finding a shoebox full of pictures previously not known to exist. I got the impression he was thankful to receive the DVD.
2 duty
chinanews.com carried a feature in January this year on the plight of PRC scholars studying in Singapore who were left in limbo after the government halted its usual practice of sending them invitation letters to apply for Singapore PR upon graduation.
If, and I don’t know, the people involved are the dividing factors – perhaps we just need more, and more varied people involved to make a fantastic proposal come to life. Perhaps what makes this project work – whether it is based in a heritage building or funded privately by members of our community is just that.
Mutiny on the Bounty
This is a tricky one. I like where Buttle has placed UKUnpublised. There are no pretentions. This is simple and accessible book publishing for those who are not out to kiss the stars or reach the New York Times bestseller list. Yes, for less, Lulu or CreateSpace could offer more in the way of reach, but that is not where this company places itself.
I haven't posted for a couple weeks now. Part of it has been the day job. Part of it was a nasty cold that has left me drained at the end of the day. And part of it is this particular essay.
Related Articles Nationwide Q1 Net Income Up; Operating Income Down 40% % Q1 Profit Down 29% for Fla.’s Universal; Up for Homeowners Choice % At Hearing, Senator Says Short-Term NFIP Reauthorization Likely % Groups Kick Off NFIP ‘Flood the Hill’ Campaign with Letter to Senate Leadership % Readers Rank Top 10 Insurance Logos % Previous MGAs Finding Success Recruiting Tomorrow’s Leaders, AAMGA Exec Says Next CNA Q&A: The Technology Factor in the Performance of CNA’s Claims Unit Related Terms Personal 2568 homeowners insurance 83 Richard Kerr 65 MarketScout 53 Personal-lines insurance rates 2 Comments Please enable JavaScript to view the comments powered by Disqus. Featured Offers –
I want to thank my gramma for the best... most fun week ever. I miss her so much.
Ever the city of opportunity and opportunists, here on the highways, in moving traffic with little clearance, we have sellers of fruit, flowers, and water. I rarely need the flowers or water, but now I regret not having purchased a bag of fruit.* It would have made a nice snack, perhaps a quick chat with the vendor, and not have left me with a story about nothing :)
Jane Fonda was saying something about the desire for independence vs. the need to be loved.
Directed by Philip John
I'm a stay at home mom - and I'm REAL, so I wanted to share this with you all! I have talked to a NUMBER of other stay at home mom friends of mine recently, and it's crazy how many others are feeling the same way! So if I'm a little (or a lot) MIA lately... you know why:) I'm fine, just needing more "me" time than usual:)
-Lin Yutang
REM Everybody hurts US
Thank you for following us here to date,
4 cloves of garlic
This is all quite mad even in Obama's terms. He sends 30,000 troops to fight terror overseas, yet if any terrorists come to attack us here, they are magically transformed from enemy into defendant.
“I had concerns over the facilities on site, with the toilets and waste water because they were originally designed for just two caravans.”
By contrast, two of the three big-box bookstores in my city are now closed, and the one remaining store is intent on changing its business model, despite having the market to itself. (I estimate that fully one-third of its floor space is now devoted to toys, baubles and educational games.) The entry to the store speaks volumes: An oversized e-reader display blocks the view like some kind of gigantic tombstone, marking the death of traditional books.
PTI Cane Print impression plate
26. i can't believe i finished this!! that's just an extra one for me ;0) you don't have to do 26!
Oh, where to begin?
Though, personally, I wouldn't want to wait around even for my starter to arrive before tucking into this liquid feast.
Hilary Clinton and Pentagon big shots responded with the usual regrets and worthless determinations to investigate, without admitting responsibility - all while Pakistan's own death toll from the "war on terror" rises, it struggles under an excess of American demands that are contrary to its own national interest, and as uninformed, people-pleasing US-senators and Republican presidential candidates continue to pick on this infinitely more important country.
41% increase in strokes
The hills stepped on him like ants,
Five feet in the air...
the auto industry go bankrupt
Where to live
Calls back the lovely April of her prime: was he merely echoing a convention, as some say, or did he mean, quite literally, that he saw the mother's girlish face, the face of the thirteen-year-old Mary Browne, whenever he looked at her son?
Where did you go to school?
The fellas geared up and hopped in the dink for a run over to Cistern Point. I told ‘em to look for the blue dinghy tie-up ball and waved them off on their adventure. Being a little bit in mother-hen mode, I watched them as they sped away, hoping to see them successfully tie up the dink and drop in for their snorkelling adventure. I saw them speed over the shallows between Cooper Island and Cistern Point. Too far, guys, the dink ball is on this side of Cistern Rock. But here they come, back toward where the dink ball lives. Then, they’re stopping. Ok. Guess they’ve found a spot they like and are happy to drop in there. Then they’re paddling. And paddling back toward Kokomo. Oh oh.
1) Though Democracy is a nice dream and a good goal, what it has become in recent years particularly in our media saturated culture is little more than mob rule. The problem is that often we have to make decisions in our society for the good of our society that most people don’t or won’t like (example: higher taxation), what happens is that we remove and approve people based on whether or not we “liked” their judgments not actually on whether or not they were or are beneficial to us in the long run. Like the mob we prop up a puppet leader to be our voice but there is little room for helpful critiques of our society.
Mr Burton said: "If there's no other legal process to go through then we will move, we won't work outside the legal process... we've been working with the council to find somewhere else that we can swap to for eight months now and that's not getting solved."
They took pictures of us getting our awards, too, full-length ones. After that the breakfast was over and after talking to a group of people for awhile I headed out to my car. While I was fumbling with my keys at my door I happened to look down and saw two of the most horrifying, scaly creatures I’d ever seen.
This was the “assault” that figures so prominently in the charges against Tasca. The officers who ganged up on Kyle Sharp have not been charged or subjected to administrative discipline – but Tasca’s refusal to help ground and pound a tiny, intoxicated woman who had made incidental contact with
Ok. I need another drink...some Oskar Blues Mama's Little Yella Pils should do the trick.
These are both good reasons to obey the laws of earthly governments, but the best reason of all is to show our love for God. God’s commandments can be summarized in New Testament language by two commandments: Love God with all your heart, mind, and strength, and love your neighbor as yourself. Can you say you love your neighbor if you commit adultery with his spouse? If you steal from him? If you covet and want better for yourself than what he has, or plot to get what he has for yourself?
The main problem arises when excess chemical and gases escape from the cracks and potentially enter the local water supply. As a result many residents living near natural gas drilling sites in America have had there water supplies contaminated. This has resulted in water becoming flammable and unsafe for human consumption. Some people who were told that the water was safe to drink later became very sick and soon discovered they had been misled. These issues and more can be found in the Oscar nominated documentary “Gasland” which really brought the controversies surrounding hydraulic fracturing to light.
it's just a baby now, so it will bloom in the spring and then i assume get those great
I believe Romans 8 may involve of rendition difference but if you wish me to address it, I can do so. I just don’t know how large you want each post to be. There comes a point, as you know, where things become discouragingly large and unmanageable, and frankly, the onlookers give up and quite looking. But, let me know if you feel it is a pertinent point to include.
The show takes place on the capital grounds in downtown Madison, WI. I will have more information available including my booth location as the show nears.
In both astronomical and astrological terminology, the sun passes through all twelve constellations or zodiac signs on the ecliptic during the course of one year. The path of the ecliptic can be seen to cross over the Milky Way at a 60 degree angle near the constellation Sagittarius. Where this happens, it forms a cross with the Milky Way, and this cosmic cross – also known as the ‘crossroads’ – was called the Sacred Tree by the ancient Maya.
There is one time however that I made my dad laugh and it was so delicious that it is forever emblazoned in my mind.
XIV
Officials say deputies were able to get the gunman on the phone, and he surrendered without incident.
As the year draws to a close, Sleepless Knight has already had to say goodbye to people I knew far too briefly, but all is not doom & gloom… not by a very long way. So I thought would share with you one or two things I have learned (or at least re-learned) in 2011. And, since this is a movie-lover’s blog, we’re gonna do it in movie style:
This monthly angel reading features the powerful date 11/11/11. In this reading, Natalia Kuna, an Angel Intuitive™ certified by Doreen Virtue, talks about the meaning and what to do to prepare for this significant date. Other inspirational, empowering as well as practical intuitive guidance for the month of November is shared in a friendly, approachable, down to earth way. To view Natalia’s weekly messages on this blog, press this link: http://nataliakuna.wordpress.com/category/weekly-angel-messages/
8)If you follow me on twitter you get two extra entries (@thegiveawaydiva)
I am linking up to these great parties:
2. Smile Consciously - There are days, when I carry that plastic smile around. I might meet people, smile and greet them cordially on those days, but haven’t really done it happily. Every morning when I awake, I make myself a promise, to smile like I mean it. Believe me just one smile coming from the heart can not only make your whole being happy, but also spread the happiness to all those who you encounter. Making this a practice everyday, very simply adds to your core happiness quotient.
Coming from Cork, my knowledge of Northern Irish politics is limited. I can remember being eight years old, watching the Good Friday Agreement being signed, and no doubt plaguing my poor father with questions. Since then, I have been an observer. I don’t see myself, my country, or indeed Britain as being determinant of the future of Northern Ireland. What I see is a people with equal, legitimate and differing political aspirations. Northern Ireland belongs to the people of the Falls Road, to the people of the Shankill Road, and to all those in between. A Corkonian cannot answer the hard political questions, however much it pains me that while the Wall may be broken in Berlin, Walls still stand a relatively short distance from my back door. It is my belief and my hope that those divisions will be torn down, with the passage of time, a more mature Stormount, and the development of a common will.
By the end of this training participants will:
159. “Only those who attempt the absurd…will achieve the impossible.” – M.C. Escher
To counterbalance our diet day from hades, let's do a few things right today:
Another memorable meal we had was a New Year meal when we stayed with our friend M. and her family. She also prepared us a beautiful crab meal with some fresh crab her son brought around. I've never seen such big crabs and the meal was amazing. Once again, cooked in the middle of the table in a pot we helped ourselves from.
Here is a way you can get one for COMPLETELY free to check out the service...
If I recall correctly, he explained that I was insulin resistant, had high testosterone and was considered pre-diabetic now. I had to go on a lean meat and vegetable diet or I would get diabetes.
kicked it down the road towards the hill on the outskirts of town. It rolled up
The Weeknd - Echoes of Silence - New singer, new addition to the list, I'm still breaking in this one, but I like how The Weeknd delivers his music so far. A LOT.
2010 these are the links that has been copied.
I started blogging as a way to combine my love for inspiring others and writing. While you'll find many crafts and DIY projects on this blog, my focus is about anything that inspires you to be the person that God
And draw and paint and sing and dance
I’m a little behind on my pictures from the first few days. So keep an eye out in the next day or two for lots of photos and some more info about the city, Italian culture and everything i’ve been up to.
This is basic stuff, easily checked, which I, untrained in these fields, can pick as problematic. All history is narrative, so the temptation to select approaches to disputed facts, so as to improve the narrative, must be strong. This implies to me that there’s other, equally erroneous, material which I’ve missed, some of which may be in the biographical data given for the subjects, so it damages my faith in the book.
handful of parsley (finely chopped)
Ferguson will also find out next week if Paul Pogba has decided to stay at United or join Juventus, according to Mino Raiola, the midfielder’s agent.
I have been losing it trying with these men…..This Year of 2012. I Want to only date you. I want to be in a relationship with you!!!! I want it to be me and you! Lord. If only for this year! but relationships are not one way. I need you to be in this with me.
As Mom and I have settled back into cohabitating as we support each other through this infernal process that is grief, one part of our routine is particularly precious: Wednesday night dinners. It's the one night of the week-- so far-- that we can count on actually sitting down at the table together to eat a homemade meal and discuss the issues of the day. GDA comes over as well, and we enjoy our party of three.
And to finish my gift for Fiona Marie swap " the Great Global Christmas Swap" is ready to fly to New Zealand !
The essence of the Gonski report is that all children in every school should receive a base level of funding equivalent to schools in which at least 80 per cent of students achieved above minimum national standard in reading and numeracy across the three years 2008-2010. This is highly aspirational: these are the best-performing schools in Australia.
Failing to trap her own animal overnight, the one-time fashion insider, who had worked with a designer who had a ‘penchant for fur dyed in bold colours’ instead headed to the basement of a hunting business, where ‘death was everywhere, and it was crowded’ and picked a frozen fox, killed earlier in the week.
How John Found the Nikon Coolpix P2 Digital Camera
But i first had to call the unemployment office to settle some question they had. And that call almost shattered me. It was so bad, for me,that i went back to bed. i do NOT want that dark depression to surround me...i will NOT give into it..and after a nice long nap, i do truly feel better. i guess i find that since being unemployed, my reaction to stressful situations is just really poor. i shut down. blech.
Will be hit and miss in blogland, but I still enjoy popping in and out when I have the time.
Example: LSU is flagged for a late hit on Brady Quinn even though he clearly still has the ball. You: “And on an extreeeeeemly suspicious play, the Raiders win!”
I guess that angle seemed too unrealistic, even too grandiose that the GM spokes-holes didn’t think such a tall tale would fool even idiotic AP beat writers (really?). Little did they know these glorified stenographers just jot down what they hear without question, and it gets published. Now I bet they wish they’d not restrained their inner Gecko.
I don't enjoy changing dirty nappies up to 4 times a day - I definitely don't enjoy waking up to THAT smell.
This is the blatant ‘Trash similar book in order to promote my/myfriends’ book’. It may be the only one or two star review you get, but it’s there and it hurts and there’s nothing you can do.
Yep. Real grass. Delivered every two weeks by the brilliant guys at Pet Patio Pickup (who I love even if they are rough on my walls when they make deliveries).
Josh Garrels’s entire new album, Love & War & the Sea In Between, is available for download for FREE here, on his website. Enough said.
to mix, to learn, to teach.
This is a cleverly crafted argument used to convince those who have been burned by religious organizations that true Christianity is unlike everything else. I can understand where this comes from because there are a lot of bad religions out there. But this argument falls short in establishing a clear foundation of knowing God within orthodoxy.
It's an exciting time at MY SHERI CRAFTS. She is turning TWO on April 1st!! No, It's no joke - LOL! I hope you have enjoyed ALL the inspiration shared with you these past two years. Thank you to all of our avid challenge participants for taking time to join us week after week!!! In honor of our birthday celebration, we would like you to create a child's birthday card/project using a colorful theme for a child under the age of 5!
Duluth Minnesota
I must have pulled the wool over your eyes.
Keep the fire low at all times and breaks lumps if formed while adding the sugar and water/ milk mix.
I learned about the American-led sanctions that prevented food, medicine, and medical equipment from entering Iraq, and how – according to the United Nations – over half a million children perished as a result. I remember a clip from a ’60 Minutes‘ interview of Madeline Albright where she expressed her view that these dead children were “worth it.” I watched on September 11th as a group of people felt driven to hijack airplanes and fly them into buildings from their outrage at the deaths of these children. I watched as America then attacked and invaded Iraq directly. I saw the effects of ’Shock & Awe’ in the opening day of the invasion – the children in hospital wards with shrapnel from American missiles sticking but of their foreheads (of course, none of this was shown on CNN).
Mmmm Rat poison, yes definitely need to keep that! I need to go stick it in the attic, they are getting noisy up there! (trapped a big wood rat in the living room the other day. He just danced in the front door when it was open!)
The woman he’d been texting when he died—what was her name? Annabeth?—had called her in hysterics when she learned of the crash, thinking Melanie would be sympathetic. “I have no one else to talk to,” Annabeth had wailed. Despite a twinge of empathy for the woman’s grief, Melanie had hung up on her. Annabeth had called once more to find out when the funeral would be, and hadn’t believed Melanie’s declaration that there would be no funeral, no memorial service. “You’re as self-centered as Alexander said you were,” Annabeth screamed.
Buying: New books, pancakes for breakfast and chocolate frappucinos
My daughter and I share the same shoe/boot size and
Hope you have a great spring weekend!
But that was all a tad corporate. And as strong as it was, there was an inclination (incorrect) to think that the plan got clipped in a three-ring binder and tossed on a credenza for the rest of the year. The Honeywell Women’s Council took the strategic planning process and integrated it into the group. If you were Programs Chair, you couldn’t begin to understand what you were going to do that year until you knew what the strategic direction for the Council would be that year. Smaller than corporate, yes, but much more immediate. It taught me to love the strategic planning process from beginning to end and back again.
We realize also that some of our choice sisters are widowed and divorced and that others find themselves in unusual circumstances where, out of necessity, they are required to work for a period of time. But these instances are the exception, not the rule.
The Investigation in Spain
We got a nice sneak peak at the opening of the previous show (Robert Amft, which was also excellent). Bergman has been working for a while and has two modes of painting that have clashed in this show. One is a dada meats Agnes Martin style where she acquires abondoned paintings at thrifts stores and turns them into faces. But the process of living with them, sometimes for years, and waiting for a moment of clarity is in touch with poetic Minimalism. When the image reveals itself a few deft brushtrokes bring it out. The other style is wild and crazy. Loose and violent, but also lighthearted and funny. These paintings come out of nowhere, but click right-on with a lot of what is going on in contemporary art.
When I started having thoughts about making out with boys, I always went to Father Dair. Father Dair was like the NYC cop of Confession and very much appreciated by the junior high set. Instead of forcing you to state your sins out loud, he just asked you straight yes or no questions. “Did you cheat?” “Yes, Father.” “Did you lie?” “Yes, Father.” “Did you have impure thoughts?” “YES, Father!” I would reply breathlessly. Way easier than saying the word impure in front of a priest.
Sometimes I beat myself up for not having been to every single brewery in town (or in the outskirts). I'd like to visit them all. I intend to. But I guess if I'm being honest, the ones I haven't checked out yet are the ones that simply have no Beer Geek Brownie Points. At no time was this made clearer than when I got my tuchas into Tugboat Brewing adjacent to Bailey's Taproom and blogged about it. It's clear that nearly every area self-respecting beer geek avoids it like the black stout they make (that I'm a huge fan of. Chernobyl Russian Imp. Stout.)
She was also sporting a KILLER pair of over the knee flat boots.
shy lady, lovely hair
So it seems to me that we don’t NEED backwards compatibility, but that we demand it. We have to have everything and we have to have it now, it would seem. Well, we can. For a price. For the sake of convinience and for the sake of fulfilling our demand to ‘have it all’, we’re happily buying the products we’ve already bought before.
An odd older guy was one of the first to get to Noel. In one of the most bizarre forms of admiration I’ve seen, he had a big, dumb grin on his face and gently touched Noel’s chest. ”I touched him!” Mind you, this guy is in his 50′s at least. But he wasn’t finished. His next move was to caress Noel’s cheek. When Noel didn’t jump back or yell at him — probably a smart move on Noel’s part — the guy leaned forward, gently grabbed Noel by the back of the hair and pulled him in for a kiss on the forehead. My reaction was to yell, “Fella, that’s messed ! What’s wrong with you?” I was afraid that this guy was going to run Noel off at any second. A friend chimed in with a “What the ****, dude!” The creepy guy just drifted off with a huge grin on his face, nearly in tears saying something like “I just couldn’t help it. I got to touch him!” You’d think it was Jesus he’d seen.
Last, do a regular reality check. You are not Superman or Wonder Woman but you do have a unique cape knit together with talents that enable you to make a positive difference in the real world of your day to day activities.
landscapes of desolate silence,
great masses of the people thrill to Pavarotti,
MultiCULTuralism is a codeword for White genocide and anti-racist is a codeword for anti-White.
Gary Finke – Blood Ties
But, the best part of the day is
Teri had a long weekend off and told her manfriend she needed to catch up with a lot of things, so she was home all weekend. We napped and played, she cleaned and pulled weeds. When it got dark, she even pulled out the laser light for us. That Disco can run faster now he's lost almost 2#, hahameow.
Goldie Inner city life UK
We are willing to engage with any proposal to secure the future of our company and its 400 employees. Any deal must satisfy the Government, its agencies and the taxpayer whose support over the last two years has helped us continue to operate and for which we are very grateful.”
Was the 15-year-old great granddaughter who stood before him at Waipahu Gym really asking him to train her to be a boxer?
Those whom I've featured here can grab my button on the right sidebar! You totally deserve it!!
Recently, the girls went to see 'Take That' with Robbie Williams at the Stadium of Light (Sunderland's ground), and me and the boys went to the 'Monster Jam' at Pride Park (Derby County's ground). We then all met up at our house for a family get-together and a walk along the river on the Sunday.
as if this Earth in fast thick pants were breathing,
We Hold These Truths sees hope. Educate the laymen within our own churches, especially mainline churches, can break Israel’s power-hold over our politicians, and it can restore others to follow Christ instead of Israel. More important, we see no other way to do it!
June 25 - July 24, 2010
Lu han was exactly the same with his photo. His face was quite a cutie! He seemed smaller at side of Kris.Lay wear a mouth mask and a hat. He was very thin. They walk fast too.
While I don’t think Cancer Research UK are saying the manufacturers are directly appealing to children per se, the tobacco companies are certainly putting out products designed to be alluring to teenagers. And the cynic in me says that the tobacco companies probably don’t remotely mind that the seeds of desire are set early.
EMPLOYEE: No, it is definitely in the fashion section. I stocked it last week. It was written by one of the “real housewives”, right?
Another beer from the same place is the golden, hoppier Piraat Ale, also available in a corked bottle. I didn't have the camera set up when I tasted this one.
Cooling and light, this balancing moisturizer absorbs quickly and helps to regulate the production of sebum. A gel cream, which keeps skin hydrated throughout day, without leaving it shiny, tight or dry. Pineapple and rosemary extracts help to reduce pore size and clear dead skin cells enzymatically. Apple pectin provides long-lasting hydration and restores suppleness. Ruby crystal minimizes the appearance of fine lines and imperfections. Mineral Cosmetology, a patented mineral delivery system, leaves skin firmer, more supple and younger-looking.
world opened up to me!!
And this shall ye do in remembrance of my body, which I have shown unto you. And it shall be a testimony unto the Father that ye do always remember me. And if ye do always remember me ye shall have my Spirit to be with you… And this shall ye always do to those who repent and are baptized in my name; and ye shall do it in remembrance of my blood, which I have shed for you, that ye may witness unto the Father that ye do always remember me. And if ye do always remember me ye shall have my Spirit to be with you. (3 Ne. 18:7,11)
After seeing Desi at Royally Sweet, we made dinner plans at an El Paso establishment called Cappetto's. It was voted #1 Italian food in El Paso, with almost 50% of the "Best of El Paso" votes. Olive Garden had about 30% of teh vote, but don't let this distort your take on Cappetto's...the food was truly delicious! Our table at Shrimp Ravioli in Basil Cream Sauce, Chicken Pesto Linguine and Spaghetti with Tomato Sauce and everyone went home stuffed, with left overs! Plus, there was a guy doing magic card tricks while we waited for our food!
It’s April Fool’s Day, so I briefly thought about writing a fake post. Inventing a wild bear adventure, or something. But I’ve never been much of an April fooler. The closest I got was telling my friends that I would probably be moving for my senior year of high school. The punch line, I actually did move. I’ll admit on April Fool’s Day, I wasn’t yet sure we’d be moving, I was mostly trying to attract attention. I did have a gut feeling that my dad would get the job all the way across the country though.
How many who claim not to be religious study and follow the leading of the horoscope? They worship their star. How many, who deny being religious, put their faith in money, worrying about it, striving to obtain it? How many, who rebel against religion, heed the advice of those around them?
Maybe he is mocking people’s views of the world. Maybe what he really means is that we need to stop clinging onto impossible thoughts, and to learn to live with what we have. To stop waiting for violin playing goats and open our eyes to all the beauty that does exist. To learn to live with the many gifts we do have in this world. And to be happy. To love them, to be content with the world in which we live. Because if we spend our life waiting, we can never truly be happy. Maybe what we really need to do is see what does exist, and the love and happiness which we can find around us, without upsetting ourselves with the non-existence of things not yet of this world. Maybe they will come before we pass, maybe they won’t. Maybe they are heavenly hopes which we must wait to find. And so perhaps what Chagall is really saying is, love and happiness are all around you… stop hurting yourself with fantasies.
Over 40 persons showed up in Downtown Hilo to plant taro and other edible plants in the median strips on Kamehameha Avenue. What had been weeds and roundup became wonderful edible landscapes in just two hours. The vibe was so positive and the intention will reverberate and hopefully spread across the globe.
I was surprised by the size of this. I was expecting the average size compact that the powder blush comes in, but unlike that (which is 6g) the ombres are 9g. I usually don't pay much attention to the weight on my compacts, but this got me looking. The beauty powders (Marine Life shown) are 10g as are the pressed powders.
The story has been filmed twice before, once in 1934 with Norma Shearer as Elizabeth and Frederic March as Robert (the film was nominated for Best Picture), and then in 1957 by the same director with Jennifer Jones, Bill Travers and Sir Ralph Richardson as Edward Barrett Moulton Barrett, Elizabeth’s father (there was also a TV version made in Britain in the 1970's) but don‘t let that deter you! I’m sure that in the hands of a strong director and writer, this story can inspire modern audiences as well.
So flawed, so imperfect
Come and buy!
In Majorca
in the high and low seas of the heart.
7. let out a good cry nearly once a day. ok, so maybe that’s more me than her…
kids able to leave the
something sweet and optimistic to get us through january - my least favourite month.
To Da Lock and Chain (should I call the tenants association?)
“A distinctive and distinguished shade of purple,” Aurelius insisted. “It brings out my eyes.”
The Elizabethans had deep faith in witchcraft. The faith, unfortunately, was more in its destructive rather than constructive powers. For example, they blamed the witches for any events that they could not control or explain.
said to me today, children really are such a blessing
Why in my opinion Windows Phone 7 will fail to succeed?
However for us the real learning happens after school hours. I know right, you thought Seton moms perpetually homeschool. Yes, we a re known as the slaves of the perpetual curriculum!! Not. After our textbook learning, we dive in our extracurricular activities. If you know me you know that I am a living opposite of the Modern ADHD mom. See the new model is fast and all over the place. Her van is running all over town thus supporting every gas station in her area and a small village in Saudi Arabia. Her kids are in the van soaking Socrates in her original language, while the baby in the car seat is soaking her diaper. The stops are many, there is competitive sports all different for each of her 6 kids. There is music lesson for the baby up to the oldest. Art lesson, fencing, golfing, swimming and if there is time left there will be a family living. Lets not forget dancing and my head is spinning. The van pulls in at the house the baby is already asleep, the kids are all well educated and rounded and dad just came home from his second job. See, I admire those moms and I wish they can bottle up their energy and sell it to me. Here is the description of me the Slow and Medieval. Again, readers chill!! You have already seen my morning routine, now let me tell you about our extra activities here in our kingdom. Lets start with the competitive sports. Here is a list of them and all my kids thake part in them:
At it’s heart, Signs of the South is a ghost story (who doesn’t love a good ghost story, right?). Ella Giancetti is a first time college professor and accepts a teaching position in Virginia. Moving from Connecticut to Virginia, Ella quickly learns of the many cultural differences separating the North from the South, from her first taste of sweet tea to the true meaning of ‘bless your heart’. Adjusting to all this while dealing with incessant phone calls from her abrasive sister Lisa and trying to figure out why someone is spray painting spiteful messages on her new house is a little overwhelming. At least there’s a handsome police officer hanging around.
The next morning waking to pour coffee and do it all over again.
the deceitful use of language, you would reduce our lives to nothing
and he was born of the Blessed Virgin Mary.
While my husband, Kim, has been blogging for nearly 5 years, for me it's an entirely new experience.
- John Gustafson: basse, choeurs
It’s easy to understand why survivors were taken in by Head’s story. The level of detail is breathtaking. Over and over, to rapt audiences, Head mourned the young man wearing a red bandana who stretched out his hand to help her to safety, only to disappear into the smoke to die a hero. She never told anyone her husband’s last name (to protect his parents’ privacy, she insisted), and sometimes she seemed to slip up and call him her fiance, but again and again, she’d recount the poignant story of their wedding in Hawaii. When she visited Dave’s name at the memorial, she liked to bring a toy yellow taxi, as a memento of their charmed first meeting, to place near the reflecting pool. Who would make all that up?
Prabhupada: “Bhaktisiddhanta Sarasvati Thakura, he said that “When our men will be sahajiya, oh, they’ll be more dangerous.” So our men are becoming, some of them, sahajiyas. This very word he said, that “When our men will be sahajiyas he’ll be more dangerous.”
We're investigating reports of users not being able to comment on IE8/9 from the embedded form. We hope to have a fix out shortly, but in the meantime we encourage admins to switch to either the full-page or pop-up forms which should be working without issue.
Big men smoking in their easy chairs
EFF 75%
(I admit, for one second the thought had crossed my mind)
The real beauty about this project, especially for picky perfectionist types, is that with nature and birch trees, no perfection is required! A little blotch here or a mistake there, eh, who would ever notice?
As simple as it is, I am really happy with how it turned out.
It was horrible! I saw it in that slo-mo action...where you want to yell, "Noooooo..." but it happens so fast you are only able to yelp, "n...."
My relationship and my love for Noel is growing stronger for each passing day. We spend as much time together as we possibly can and enjoy discovering just how alike we are and how alike our thinking are in so many aspects. We spent five nights in his house during Easter and that was the first time I got to see where he lives and it's lovely. Ten minutes from city center and ten minutes to the beautiful coastline. He owns a four bedroom house in a quiet estate in a very good and safe area. I fell in love with the place. His house is very much a reflection of him himself. He is a private man, an observer with his head well screwed on. He hates conflicts but he will stand up for what he believes in and he will protect those he love. He has spent two years in the military then moved on to the navy as an engineer where he eventually became a Lietuenant Commander. He showed us the naval base and we got to see the ship he used to be stationed on board.
when we were getting ready for the wedding off of my mom's blog.
Hops: Colombus (added at 10 different times from start to finish)
A bizarre assertion? Well, did anybody notice the near- total lack of anti-American themes during the Arab Spring? It may not have been Assange's intent... but that felicitous outcome was the exact thing that he wrought, and maybe our leaders should ponder the lucky break.
When we first moved into this home, I knew I was going to fill the sunroom with plants. I didn't have the best light in my old home, so many plants didn't do well. Here, they are thriving in this light filled, warm room! Nester has gotten me quite excited to try my hand at growing succulents-have you ever seen glorious succulents pouring from rusty, weathered old urns? Fabulous, I tell ya!
Converts 110/120 V to 220/240 V OR converts 220/240 V to 110/120V
Stoke improved after the break and dominated as they searched for an equaliser. A football match even threatened to break out occasionally, as we looked at times to keep possession in the middle of the park and even build from the back. Those moments were few and far between however, and soon we were back to the kind of bad decision-making with our passing that blighted the win over Wolves (Shotton, Delap and Whitehead were the worst offenders) and were back to hoofing it in the direction of players who were clearly double or even triple marked and hoping to win a throw or free kick.
2 T. mayo
Congratulations to *Star & thanks to everyone that played along & hopped with us on our first blog hop.
Gupta: "Dr. Lustig believes that's primarily because we replaced a lot of that fat with added sugars."
“Oh, I agree! Sunny has an extra pound or two (or five, I thought), but really, what are a dog’s pleasures? Eating and going for walks? What the heck?!”
In Enid Blyton’s Five on a Treasure Island, published in 1942, the story revolves around Julian, Dick, George and Anne finding a treasure map with the word ‘ingots’ (gold) marked by a red ‘x’. Luckily the map is of an island owned by George’s family, but before they can search for the treasure they hear the island is to be sold, resulting in a race against time.
I ask her how it affected her relationship with her husband. "He didn't agree of much of anything I did. Unschooling was just another area. We hardly saw eye to eye on anything," is her response.
So, the final choice is decide which CPU/motherboard combo I want. The motherboards are very similar with SATA III, USB 3.0 and great overclocking potential (not that I will do very much, just a few Mhz).
A young man sits stiffly in one of the chairs, leaning forward as if ready to pounce. He hangs on to his companion’s every word.
The day after Bubba's birthday we had his two year check up. We had to wait a bit and thankfully the iPhone is their new best friend when waiting is involved in anything. I love the educational toddler apps. Bella's has learned so much from them. Bubba loves watching her play Word Wagon. Now if only he'd learn to talk, but we'll get to that soon enough.
Wow. Um, who ever expected the return of these characters? I was too much in shock by that surprise to be able to figure out if there was much of a point to this sketch. But, anyway, I don’t think there was. C
Beyond the overwhelming selection at GABF, there is a month’s worth of things to see and do around town.
3. Sure, change is the only constant, neighborhood names change, etc etc, but just spouting that truism (and I just did, I know) isn't exactly a complete analysis. Change happens in all sorts of ways, and equating the "change" of the 1970s in Crown Heights (white flight, city service cutbacks, massive immigration) the current round of change obscures more than it reveals. There's a nearly infinite number of ways for a neighborhood to change, and we regulate certain types of change all the time, whether through rent control, BIDs, zoning, subsidies, community boards, or whatever other levers of power you can think of. Some of these institutional mechanisms promote growth, some deliberately slow it, and many of them exist as a result of local political battles for control of precisely this - the WAY change happens. Compare, say, DUMBO to Fort Greene to Williamsburg, all neighborhoods that "gentrified" in the same general time period. The processes were, in some cases, night and day, whether the work of a single broker-developer in DUMBO to the artist-colony model up north to the slow-growth community-driven Fort Greene model. All change is not created equal, which brings me to my final point . . .
Today I thought I would give you a little insight as to how I plan to change within myself.
The final most misunderstood, mocked, and hated part of a rat is their tail. Indeed, it is not their best feature. But I have a big nose and my parents didn’t refuse to allow me in their house on Christmas Day! My sister thinks her eyebrows are ugly but no one points and screams when they see her. Danny’s dog often has matted, muddy fur and terrible doggy breath and yet everyone who meets Abby exclaims over her adorableness. So why are rats so chastised, so excluded, based on one little physical feature that they can’t help at all? No one kicked Julia Roberts out of Hollywood despite her teeth; Jim Carrey has the crazy eyes going on, but everyone loves his potty humor movies and obvious insanity. Lady Gaga makes millions of dollars by looking like something my rats threw up! So why, why, I repeat, are my handsome rat friends vilified by owning one squirmy little tail?? I don’t understand and I suppose I never will. To distract myself, I’ve drawn a picture of the invention I created to get people over their irrational hatred of rats’ tails.
I've already written a little bit about this album over at my other blog when I was doing my 30 Days of Nintendo series. My aunt and uncle gave my The Champion for Christmas the same year I got my Nintendo. They were trying to get me into Christian music because at the time I was grooving to Metallica's ...And Justice For All. They were the same relatives that would hate Tourniquet years later. So my cousin and I sat in my grandma's computer room and listened to Carman. She was unimpressed (her favorite band was Skid Row). Surprisingly, I liked it. I still do somewhat - the fast songs anyway. Carman's ballads are about as captivating as listening to grass grow. He's still cheesy though. I literally laughed out loud at points. I distinctly remember my dad yelling at me while I listened to this and played Super Mario Bros. The part in "A Little Bit More Conviction" where Carman sings about two brothers going to a "sexy movie show" caused my father to yell, "WHAT KIND OF TRASH ARE YOU LISTENING TO!?" Of course, this is the same man who thought Bride's "Hell No" was about Vietnam.
"This represents another key link in the Ward One and city-wide cycling system,” said Councillor Brian McHattie. “This link will encourage more folks to leave their car at home when traveling for short trips in west Hamilton. The next step is to work with Fortinos/Loblaws to connect the Dundurn bike lanes. My goal is to see the Ward One cycling system in place by 2014.”
Today I'm especially grateful for spring. It is and always has been my favorite season. Even though we had an unusually warm winter, it was still brown and colorless. I love, love, love the colors and smells of spring, and the way everything comes back to life. It's hard to stay depressed when everywhere you look is color and life.
I read a novel the other day where the main character was a grieving widow with a young daughter, but neither character showed any symptoms of grief — at least not what I have come to know as grief. The only indication of their grief was a conversation about how the two needed to be strong and not cry.
Oh, by the way, we have 2 openings right now in our language arts department that happened during the last week. (Grades 6-9 are open.) We're located in Camilla, Georgia and you can email your resume to info@westwoodschools.org. If you want to get rich teaching, I wouldn't apply. If you want a rich life, you're welcome to join us in our tiny town of beautiful people and hard work.
13. Concrete Jungle
You see, my man of old back in Webster was a big fan of this superheroine that has the ability to fly and create auras of different colours with power. I mean, come on, what kind of a weird character is that? And just because I was born a female, he gave me that stupid name, Halo.
Having found a workable ratio, I ordered up a conversion kit from Charlie the Bikemonger (that may not really be his name), a new 44-tooth Suntour chain ring from the Edinburgh Bicycle Cooperative and got to work stripping down the existing Shimano kit. In truth you don’t need to change the chain ring and you can probably knock up a rear sprocket and tensioner from your existing dérailleur set-up but I wanted stronger parts and my rear cassette and chain were worn out anyway.
Pepler, D. & Craig, W. (2008). Bullying, interventions, and the role of adults. Education.com. Accessed on April 25, 2012.
1/2 Korean radish, cut into round, then cut into 4 section, then thinly slice each section
that my children and I
It’s a success story of a company that has from the start embraced public shareholder ownership.
What's different here, however, is Sharpton's willingness to entertain the possibility, rather than dismiss it outright.
I always take one suitcase filled with gifts when I go to Japan. I lost the before photo of the suitcase but here is a photo of my bag when I got home. I filled half with paper goods and of course wonderful items from the Ghibli Shop but the rest is over filled with gifts given to me. I repacked this bag about three times.
The authorities agree that Emma has been well cared for and that Ms X has a great understanding of her daughter’s problems however, they feel that she would not be able to care for the child on a full time basis.They say that Ms X is a wonderful and dedicated mother but the stress of looking after a child like Emma will become too much for her and have suggested that she has mental health problems.
A story is in my head today that my dad told me years ago. There was once a minister in a rural parish who woke to see that there had been heavy snow. He at first assumed that no one would come but then decided (as Him Indoors has) that he should go to the church building just in case. His manse was next door to the church.
Life has been nothing else but an unending chorus of arguments at home, it makes you feel like life without quarrels isn’t life at all, so there’s never a real commitment to get rid of the quarrel. If it’s at work, you have felt for a long time that working hard is staying in late so even if you’ve sorted out the operational problem you have, you’ve found something else to keep you at work. If it’s money, you’ve paid back the debt but haven’t cleared the reason you went into a debt burden in the first place, so you get more debt to get rid of another problem.
Sarah Michelle Gellar started her acting career as a child with a recurring role on the daytime drama "All My Children" and made her transition to adult actress while starring on "Buffy the Vampire Slayer".
I have a few questions for my readers. Have you ever heard of ALEC? Do you know what the acronym even stands for? Do you know the harm that this group alone has caused to public school and school teachers?
DARPA is at it again. This time, the Defense Advanced Research Projects Agency has announced plans to create nanochips for monitoring troops health on the battlefield.
In addition to technological innovation, HSV has added a significant set of changes only in the E-Series 3, which include:
That I'd never get to say
This verse seems pretty clear that for those who choose to hurt God’s chosen people, it is possible to have a strong measure of wrath brought down upon them by the direct order of God.
More information on the Springbok Tour:
The Lord has revealed that when a man and a woman are married according to his law, children born to them will be theirs throughout all eternity.
We got into the car and decided to rush back home once we picked up my mum. I use the word rush very loosely because what usually takes a half hour in normal traffic took TWO AND A HALF HOURS……
under fronds that hide her body,
Ideally in a dark, locked room,
It was a perfect little weekend, although rough in the start and too short over all. I'd go back to Marseille in a minute!
don’t just state facts–tell how they impacted me
*The Last Frontier Gardener, on the advice of her attorney, would like to assure the readership, both the accidental and purposeful variety, that this dream is perfectly office appropriate. One’s aged neighbors will not be rushed to the ER if they catch a glimpse of your screen. And your young children may read over your shoulder without harm. If you allow that sort of thing….
However, there is a church service, a recognition that happens prior to Easter. Holy Week is filled with recognition of things that happened in that last week of Christ's life. Palm Sunday, Maundy Thursday, Good Friday, and Easter Sunday.
In 15 years of marriage we have finished degrees, moved between states(WI/MN to KS, MI, WI) and a year in Strasbourg, France. There were internships/residencies, and then jobs we loved and didn't love. We decided to grow our family, there were miscarriages, and then 3 pregnancies and birthing 3 beautiful boys in 5 years. And then in our 11th year we began our journey into adoption and brought home our daughter from Ethiopia. There have been wonderful furry little souls (Porter the Pug, BlueBoy) that we have loved, snuggled with and said good-bye to. We purchased several homes, each of which we worked hard on, loved and made memories in. We have lived on loans, and very small pay checks, pinched pennies and recycled cans (10cents a can) in Michigan to make ends meat. We have played hard and lived/ traveled around the world, with 2 small children. We have yelled and cried, made mistakes and resolved to do better. We have grown some gray hairs and began some lines on our faces, hopefully more from smiling.
And maybe I won't feel guilty when I do make some money for my family. And maybe I will even feel like I contribute when I grow a garden or make fresh food or have a happy home. Maybe I will find joy in doing a few creative things for myself AND joy in being a housewife AND joy in the paid work I do outside of my home.
4) £50,000,000 will be available every year for the next 50 years for transfers, a Fernando Torres every year for the next 50 years…..
Oh dear.....
Could all this have been avoided? The answer is a simple but definite YES. Ambiga was offered to hold her rally in stadiums, according the one she had requested for in BERSIH 2.0, but refused saying it was an 11th hour offer. Yet, she had no problem whatsoever demanding for her demands to be met by the Elections Commission immediately. There was clear incitement by political figures including Anwar, and even Nik Aziz admitted to giving RM200 per participant from PAS to join the rally, even to the point of issuing a “fatwa: saying that it is compulsory for PAS members to be part of the rally. Ambiga, through the previous BERSIH rallies should know better that incitements by political figures bring about highly-charged atmosphere; and that there is no way for her to control the behaviour of 25,000 people. Did she knowingly go ahead with the rally with these facts in hand? My answer would be YES.
a few months ago, we stayed at the argosy casino and hotel for a wedding.. and boy, was it beautiful... by far the most luxurious hotel I had ever visited... I said to the hubbs, "bring me back for our anniversary, mm'kay?" I believe he replied with "deal!"
The server-side process is not as fast as the client-side because the page needs to be resubmitted but unless the page is too large for the screen you will barely notice the page refreshed. The longest process is generally generating a new image which must occur both client and server-side.
Another 'dream' picture, this one for a sun room/garden room. When I lived in Southern California, sunshine pouring in from everywhere, I knew nothing of long grey days, wet and windy days that would keep us indoors for hours. Now, I need to pretend that the sun will come out soon, and green things can grow anywhere.
WIAH: “...you said the most important thing was to describe ‘the thingness of things’. Do you still believe that?”
On the personal front (if you're interested, you may want to make a coffee first as this could be a LONG post!!!!!)
Give thanks for unknown blessings already on their way. ~Native American Saying
Fear drove them out of South Africa:
KEHHD Blog (kehhdblog.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
Close-up
- SKETCH!! YIPPEEE! (see below) This week I tried to tap it cool on all the extra everything. hee hee .... ya, this is my simple card. sigh...I just can't do simple. That is such an art within itself I tell ya!
I came across an interesting stat on sensex since 1992, which I am replicating straight. It can give us an idea what could be the holding period required and best part how richer we could emerge after this downtrend!!!
It could only have been Cain and his new family, -- a new breed of man, a Mongolian race of beings whose existence could only have come about when Cain’s seed mixed with the black-skinned pre-Adamite races from God’s first creation, and later with Adam’s fair daughters. This may sound preposterous and improbable, but once you’ve read the rest of this posting you’ll see why the earliest and most wicked savages of Asia were white and yellow-skinned barbarians, and why the picture painted here is not as illogical as it may seem at first sight.
Unfortunately, they approached a cliff. Left with no choice, Lee Gak prompts his horse to jump to the opposite cliff and his men followed his lead.
Alan Rosenberg has succeeded Melissa Gilbert as President of the Screen Actors Guild and has assured further cooperation with Native American actors. This will keep Mark Reed in his “activist” role for the next two years.
CHOICE.
Sing and dance together and be joyous, but let each one of you be alone.
Talking to people in person.
Holy day, now time
If you want added info with reference to Overseas Property Investment or Caymans Islands Property, stop by the Author’s website this minute!
Destini loves school - Kali hates it
your beloved Son,
Brown’s attention was drawn to a brassy metallic rod three inches in diameter hanging down from the apex of the center of the room and at its end was attached a many-faceted red gem, which tapered to a point.
Ostensibly there could be tons of security risk to (say) having all your financial information linked to one card, but there actually might be greater security because you would need the phone and the card at the same time to use it.
Gary Thomas addresses this issue, reminding us that we need to watch our weight and get into shape for reasons other than our physical health.
See what I did there? This is like when Kramer destroyed all of George Constanza’s computers in his apartment because serenity now didn’t work. I guess Amare didn’t have one of his rubber balls with him to squeeze after the game.
Now, is that because I was in a good mood; because the director, Carol Reed really got things right; or because my idea of what Victorian London was like was shaped by the same filmic traditions out of which Oliver! was born? However hard I try, I will never shake from my DNA the mutations brought about by exposure, Sunday by Sunday throughout my childhood, to BBC dramatisations of classic stories set in the past, and black-and-white film such as the David Lean classic Oliver Twist (1948).
My Toms. When Toms first came out I first thought they were kind of weird looking, I thought "I am so not getting those." Well my little sister decided that she really like them and when I saw these and tried them on I was hooked. I wear them a lot and they are much more comfortable then I thought they would be. :)
- In Eureka, Nevada, USA, it is still illegal for men with moustaches to kiss women.
I've seen the whole collection for sale by Kruk Cards on eBay. Can't remember how much he wanted for them, but I think it was approaching four digits. I tried not to spend more than just below high book value, keeping it closer to low book in many cases.
In 1982, a human skull was found in the Narmada Excavation in a layer of volacanic ash between 75000 and 750,000 years old, closer to the 750000 boundary. It is either a homo erectus or a homo sapiens.
Note: None of us had done a “trial” run down the river, you know, to scout the trek.
Bit of trivia: Nichelle Nichols, who played the Ahura on Star Trek, has a small part as another secretary. It always makes me smile when she appears because scifi has been a big part of my growing-up (I was watching the original Star Trek series by the time I was three years old), and Ahura was a favorite of mine when I was little. Sadly, she doesn't have nearly enough screen time.
We have decided to sell Patches, just think how much money you will save in Busy Bones alone! We think we are genious and will soon create a business to assist other families in need.
2. Parkour H-O-R-S-E- Parkour, if you’re not familar with the term, it’s defined by Wikipedia “when participants move through their environment by vaulting, rolling, running, climbing, and jumping.” It’s basically what you see Jackie Chan doing in every movie he’s ever made. H-O-R-S-E is a shooting game using a basketball. Each player has to match the last player’s shot, and if he/she misses, they get a letter. First person to spell Horse, loses. Now instead, imagine matching flips, wall kicks, and roof jumps. I know way more exciting right? Of course you would never do this sober, and you could very easily die. Plus you will most definitely break everything in the host’s house. But that’s part of the fun.
A while later he ran back into the room and waited for us to hit the end of a paragraph.
This cute little guy would look really sweet propped up against your books (wise owls love books!). Alternatively you could fill him with lavender instead of polyster stuffing to make a cute lavender sachet, or add a loop of ribbon before you sew his front and back together and display him on the wall or hanging from a doorhandle.
The super high-gloss paint is subtle, but I love how it shines on the cabinets! I couldn't put regular ol' pulls in a room like this, so these bright ceramic knobs are perfect for the Colonial Mexican style.
"No. Mommy. No. Go home!"
Anyway, this Tonkatsu was introduced in Korea via Japan a long time ago and became very popular among many Koreans. We call it "Donkas, 돈가스". The sauce that goes with this Katsu is slightly different. Japanese use very condensed thick syrupy sauce that just drizzle over the cutlet, and Koreans use tomato based gravy over the top. I like them both but I am going to make Japanese version this time.
My cousin sent her husband to their local LDS bookstore to buy a copy of Espionage. When he got home, he told her that the clerk hadn’t been very helpful at all—because she was distracted, reading my book. Hearing that story made my day.
Stossel said he left “because it sucked there.” He went on to describe a working condition where ABC “tolerated him for years” and “held their noses,” but by the end Stossel said he was looking for the closest door.
Recently, light therapy has also been found effective in the treatment of such nonseasonal forms of depression as bipolar disorder. One 2001 study found that bright light reduced depressive symptoms 12–35% more than a placebo treatment in nine out of 10 randomized controlled trials.
“And yet,” Casey smiled coquettishly, “I could have sworn you were fantasising about me last night, when you were making love to your wife. Whom you love, as you say.” She smiled again, a tiny, self satisfied smile and relaxed further into the chair, letting one of her kitten heel shoes drop onto the thick yellow carpet. She lifted her leg up and pointed the toes of her naked foot at his face, “is that not so, John?”
Runner Up : Utobeer - My local, what can I say but 700 + beers can be pretty hard to chose from.
So what's the deal?
“True success is a smile,” Orman says philosophically. “It’s a smile in your heart because you feel like your life is complete. Then you’re successful. It’s not gauged by how much money you have. Look at Bernie Madoff. He was seriously considered a success by so many—even when he was hurting so many.”
Gale Hansen (Charlie Dalton)
Eleven (11) pages (looks to be complete story) by Rich Buckler from Vampire Tales "The Praying Mantis Principle" ("The first Hodiah Twist story," writes Don. "A very popular story. Gene Colan drew the next Hodiah Twist story,and he always referred to it as the first time we ever worked together, totally forgetting he had drawn a KILLRAVEN: SOMETHING WORTH DYING FOR.
I want to write a book that makes me feel the way this song makes me feel.
Rick Santorum’s Romney attack, reporter outburst CNN: How U.S. found, killed Osama bin Laden There Was Only One Chance to Get Bin Laden ROMNEY CAMPAIGN MGR CITES TWO GOPS EXAMPLES TO CHARACTERIZE THINKING OF AMERICAN PEOPLE When Will Romney Catch Up on Foreign Policy? Oh, No! Newt, Say It Isn’t So. Say You’re Going Far Away…For a Long Time! I Wonder What It’s Like in Romney’s Parallel Universe Mitt Romney and his Etch-a-Sketch Romney vs. reality: Student loans edition College Affordability Romney’s adventures with the truth Five steps President Obama has taken to protect our environment Jimmy Fallon Sings ‘Walk of Shame’ with Dave Matthews: Late Night with Jimmy Fallon
To put you in today
Really small kids might have some difficulty with the jeopardy that Oscar is placed in and at the off-screen death of his mom. Parents should expect some hard questions to come up when they leave the theater, but certainly their kids should fall in love with the majesty of the forest that is displayed here – I know this adult did.
Even though it’s insulting, it is also challenging, encouraging and so far makes exercise fun.
I didn’t, because I know what a criminal looks like, I knew you weren’t one, and I thought you were overreacting to all of this and using it as an excuse to brush me off when you didn’t want to deal with me. I couldn’t imagine a woman this hateful and courts this stupid.
Fat women are proof that women hate male sexuality.
This is absolutely the funniest thing on TV (and I’m sure it will get canceled any day now–and no thank you Lost for preempting Ted for the foreseeable future). It is incredibly clever, with one-liners flying all over the place. The cast works great together, Portia di Rossi is phenomenal and Alison Anders is probably my favorite actress on TV these days. The deadpan delivery of everyone is phenomenal, and who doesn’t love Glasses and Mustache down in the lab (actually, Glasses and Moustache are the same person. Damn).
This assessment by the Trial Chamber is more consistent with the findings of the Truth and Reconciliation Commission. One of the intriguing features of the transitional justice mechanisms in Sierra Leone is that the two main bodies, the Special Court and the Truth Commission, have not necessarily shared the same vision of the conflict. The Court has focused on external factors, blaming Taylor, Ghaddafy and others for the civil war. The Truth Commission, on the other hand, tended to downplay the role of external actors like Taylor and proposed an analysis that found the main cause of the conflict to be the decades of tyranny and corruption within Sierra Leone. With its more modest perspective on the involvement of Taylor, the 26 April 2012 judgment
And mamma in her 'kerchief, and I in my cap,
There’s nothing like having change forced upon me to make me see all the reasons not to change, so reading that explanation gave a bit of relief: if, in fact, my (Somebody) Hamlet dream came as any sort of geographic guidance in answer to my turmoil (I’m not convinced that’s what it’s about), it might be saying it’s okay to stay close to home for now and not pick up and move to some far-flung place under duress.
Any suggested
"iRan" is bound to appeal to the youngsters of today, with their music and their jiggy dancing and their burkas-gone-wild. It will especially appeal to the youngsters in iRan, of which you have rather a lot, as they will think it's progressive. This will definitely get their votes. Whatever political party is using this, for whatever purpose, will have the kids behind them. Make it a point to ridicule them if they don't support it, and get it out on T-shirts, quickly. Tell them "It's not your parent's iRan." They'll get the message.
as I look over and see a basement squat
Conditions … Conditions
Sometimes the excess can become excessive and exceed the reason for being. That is what was bad about the Durans and the fact they, and many other artists like them, drew me away from the music in and of itself. Of course this period was so full of wonderful Pop that I regret none of it and treasure it all, even the slightly dubious.
Sweet Mango chutney to glaze top of meatloaf (I recommend Patak brand)
In order to improve the health of your body or your life, you need to make sure you have the supplies that you need, otherwise there is no chance you'll make it past the first hurdle.
CES (Crafty Emmas Store challenge)- Embellish Me More (use at least 4 different types)- I used 2 different types of flowers, the wire and bead spray thing lol, pearl flourishes, ribbon and lace, and a little bow with pearls inside too.
I learned from the Best
Santa Claus Is Coming To Town
I had no reason to worry, because absolutely everything about me was legal, and on the level. But I needed to drive to Chicago from Winnipeg, Canada, that day, and if I were turned away at that desolate and windswept prairie crossing straddling Manitoba and North Dakota, I didn’t know what I’d do. I’d heard rumors of arbitrary refusals and I worried, without reason, that I would be denied access.
15) Fujitsu Computer System Corporation
CM: Damn Dale, those are the harshest words I've ever seen from you...
Raspberries- Everbearing raspberries, treated well, are just that—ever bearing.
To Alix “Osa, drop it!”
Grill shaved coconut in a pan without any fat until it is slightly golden. Sprinkle it on the white chocolate layer in your glasses. To finish, top the whole thing with raspberry and litchi.
To celebrate Hispanic Heritage Month, I have picked a classic of Latin American literature: “One Hundred Years of Solitude” by Colombian Nobel-Prize winner Gabriel Garcia Marquez.
Like I said before I'm feeling focused again. I think there are a couple of factors at play: 1. feeling settled into my new job a little more and 2. the Chicago trip coming up. It has put my blog, my friends and my BAND at the forefront of my mind. Here we go with only blogging when I feel good. That is NOT why I blog. Not to brag, but to both give and get support. Must do better at that.
It only make sense for RVers to consider the size of the dog that will share their traveling home. A pet, its bed, food and water bowls, leash, scooper, toys, grooming equipment, food and other paraphernalia is going to take up a certain amount of precious space.
There are several different species of lysimachia (Lythrum salicaria), which is of the Primulae family. The various species are known by a variety of common names, such as willow herb, purple willow herb, long purples, moneywort, rainbows, soldiers, creeping Jenny, and purple and yellow loosestrife.
and rained.
8/10 A big caramel transatlantic IPA, floating somewhere between a big West Coast IPA and a Fullers ESB.
*grins*
AMcCC: Just as well I'm not going for publication, then!
The Loop reports that Apple has finally confirmed the long-awaited media event. The wait will soon be over: Apple has scheduled a press conference next Tuesday, October 4. The event will take place at Apple’s home turf, its Cupertino campus in California at 10am PT, as rumored. If an email invitation is any indication, this will definitely be an iPhone-focused media event. AllThingsD has it on good authority that Apple CEO Tim Cook will deliver the presentation, a first for Cook in his new CEO role.
WHY:
Morello: Right. What’s the issue here?
Since U Been Gone
The female body is complicated and mysterious, and this is especially true when it comes to sex and orgasm. Many women don’t understand their anatomy or sexual response, so it’s no surprise that men are even more baffled about what makes a woman tick sexually. And, thanks to myths and urban legends, misinformation only further complicates a man’s understanding of the female body.
Symptoms: Sciatic nerve pain at work and hungry a lot more than before.
Many aspects from these entries remain open, like for example the smoothness of transcriptions of Old Nubian in the existing fonts, the integration of such texts in a web environment like the present one, the completeness of the existing lists of online textual resources, the content analysis of these etc.
In the Leiby Kletzky case, hours went by before the NYPD was contacted and during this time, a videotape that was in the possession of the Shomrim Safety Patrol went by the wayside. The videotape was crucial to the investigation and if viewed earlier, may very well have led to the rescue of the child while he was still alive.
So that's what I do, I just gently put the eggs in the electric water kettle (you don't want to chip them because cleaning this out is harder than a pot).
Toss apples into a large saute pan with enough water to just cover the bottom of the pan. Bring to a boil and reduce heat to simmer for 10 -15 minutes, or until the apples are tender and the water reduces. Continue cooking until the apples are browned and the water has become syrupy. Add cinnamon and puree or fork mash to desired consistency. Serve with yogurt, oatmeal, or whatever your baby likes best!
Entering the stratosphere.
He admitted that it didn't matter what colour the sky really was that day, he would always paint it SKY BLUE. PUSB! PUSB! Magritte must have been a Coventry City fan werhoooooo!
Yesterday, I was able to remove several things from the list. I wrote an article for the newsletter (check) and painted two wooden easels I'll use for an orchestra-related event (check). Finalized a design for an orchestra T-shirt (check). This morning, I laid out the first page of the newsletter (check), printed order forms for those community band shirts I mentioned (check), left a message for someone I want to interview for the newsletter (check), made an appointment to have the dog groomed on Saturday so I can shoot the video without barking interruptions (check), called the landscaper (check) and took care of a typesetting job that has been waiting for my attention (check).
$1.50 off MeoxMix
04 Battery Brides
Some product highlights are:
Mom: “Was bananas the scentport of is there another Easter monkey?”
And -- here's the big finish: Can you name the pitcher with at least 300 innings pitched whose ERA is closest to Pi? Obviously I wouldn't ask unless it was absolutely the perfect -- THE PERFECT -- pitcher for such a thrilling designation. You ready?
So no matter what comes our way...Woo Hoo! :0) We are going to see the funny/bright side of it no matter what. We are going to be grateful for what we DO have! Things are good! Life is good! Lee and I may feel like we lead boring lives compared to some but life keeps us on our toes(as well as our aging appliances...hehe).
07. National Anthem
After lunch we had a 1,5 hour walk by Garda lake. It was crazy! This might sound like nothing, but after having a heavy meal and walking for that long with no idea how long we were going to walk and where are we headed to, it felt like eternity walking down by the lake with same view.
They're dark chocolate dipped molasses ginger cookies, featured on Martha Stewart's whole living site. You would never guess they're gluten free. We couldn't keep them in the house...so we'll be making more later today.
I have lately been doing this sort of thing every day: I doodle things that I want in what I call my 'creation box', and also write down lists of things I am grateful for. It lifts my spirits like you wouldn't believe, and helps turn a dreadful day into a warm, wonderful one.
The thrill of that brief moment, when I was about 6 years old, was relieved in all its Technicolor excitement. I remembered holding onto the car door for dear life as my dad drove his car down the driveway of my grandmother’s home.
In fact, given the incredibly affordable apartment rental prices there, we even toyed with the idea of renting a small place in Montreal to encourage regular visits. Now that we’ve given up on the idea of buying a cottage, that seems entirely reasonable. But it’s also swinging the pendulum in the opposite direction. Maybe we should rein it in and just look at adding a few trips a year, rather than planning visits for every second weekend!
09 - One Man's Pleasure 03:28
B.A. (Honours) Music
2. You must have the required entry completed before any extra entries will be counted.
Each year I obsess over what I term ‘the running of the duckings’ which is when the ever-present Canadian geese have their babies. I consistently go on the hunt to obtain photos of the cute little balls of fluff.
save their villages from the disasters of logging and gold mining…
resigned to injustice where naked-
Clean up should use very little liquid/solvent. The more wet the plate gets, the shorter time it will last. The liquid seeps into the lines of the plate and the paper absorbs it. A good idea to edition the plate in one or two sessions.
I glued ours down while they were still slightly pliable. Doing so allowed the pieces to mold to the slightly concave edge of the paper plate.
People who have experienced bullying might:
Christ commanded his apostles to baptize.
Quality: Very good
“Look at us,” she spoke as she shrugged one shoulder.
Thousands of people would have surely been killed by now.
530 **D-IV/18(B)/1962. “On Constitutional Etiquette: A Dialogue.” Otterbein College, Westerville, Ohio. (Incorporated in Item C-1976(1), above, pp. 143-44.)
Spend an evening in the country, go west and get your grass on!
I love how Sheila Rumney created this digital layout and cut a heart shape from one of the papers from CD # 1, Creating With Vintage Patterns. The hankie is also a PNG file , which means it has been cut out (even the lace edge) so it can be layered over other pages.
On Series 6 overall:
Mom- Daddy wont be mad, he loves the rain
Nelson’s more than 15 years in marketing includes nine years as global lead for entertainment marketing at Motorola Inc. She is credited with leading the global launch of the first iPhone with iTunes, the Motorola ROKR, and was the company’s first African-American to be named advertising manager for Europe, the Middle East and Africa, based in Milan, Italy.
I’m stuck.
1948 – Perry King (actor: A Cry in the Night, Kaleidoscope, The Lord’s of Flatbush, Mandingo, Search and Destroy, Switch)
You can tell that getting older is not something I am enjoying. The only good thing is, it's better than the alternative.
7. riverrun, past Eve and Adam's, from swerve of shore to bend of bay, brings us by a commodius vicus of recirculation back to Howth Castle and Environs. —James Joyce, Finnegans Wake (1939)
( Just as an aside, cause this has been very helpful in my life; “if someone’s act or words are coming from love, it’s personal, if an act towards you is not based in love, it’s not personal, it’s about them.” Fear is never personal. If it feels personal, then we must have something within ourselves that matches the words or actions and that is a great opportunity to wake up to that. Thank the person and move on lol, so easy to say, so much more difficult to do)
I try to cycle for a couple of hours daily for my physical and mental well-being. The other day while I was out, my chain came off. In spite of the fact he was all dressed up to do an open house, a young realtor stopped to ask if he could help. I wouldn't let him actually touch anything (no point in both of us touching that well greased chain) but he did teach me something that I didn't know about my bike which made it so easy to put the chain back on. I can't wait until my son gets back from university so I can teach him this tip!
This is the third in a series of books beginning with "Friday Night Knitting Club" and follows the characters to whom we have been previously introduced. The second book had little voice of the glue that held the first book together -- its heroine, Georgia Walker, who dies at its conclusion. Wisely, she inserts flashbacks from Georgia's life into "Knit the Season" (yes, it's set during the winter holidays), which helps us understand why and how these women come together and her influence.
Check the chicken!
Steam trapped forever, frozen in a glass box at the bathroom window...And we all saw it...
Paper: Whisper White, Real Red, Peach Parfait, Garden Green, Real Red Patterns Designer Series Paper, Peach Parfait Patterns Designer Series Paper
BE SURE TO LINK YOUR ENTRY BY MIDNIGHT, ET-U.S., MARCH 31, 2012.
But what happens when the chain restaurants get a little fancier? The next step up the ladder gives you Applebee’s then Olive Garden maybe a California Pizza Kitchen. Here in New York and other large cities, high-class chain restaurants can easily set a guest back $60 per person. Haru, a restaurant group with “nine high class locations” is mostly found on the east coast but a competing sushi restaurant chain (and former employer), SushiSamba can be found from Los Angeles to Vegas to New York to Tel Aviv. Talk about always feeling at home. But why not just go to a place that actually shows the local flavor?
It never scales back. It never "right-sizes". It never strips away laws or shreds outdated regulations.
Contrary to what some might consider “traditional,” history suggests that the original version included raisons. “The tart’s history has been traced back to the arrival of the filles de marier in the mid-1600s,” writes Toronto Star Food Editor Susan Sampson. “To fill their tarts, these imported brides from France had to make do with what they found in their new larders: maple syrup or sugar, farm-fresh butter and dried fruit (read raisins).”
But it’s not a simple matter of turning a switch. It’s one of those horrible situations where I don’t actually want to change. I want to want to change. That’s a much bigger hurdle. Every few years I make an effort to smile more often, and it never lasts. Because I don’t want to smile more often. I want to want to smile more often. All the while a little voice shouts, in monotone, NOT SMILING IS YOUR THING. DON’T LOSE YOUR THING.
Length : 20.5"
it's been a long time since i've posted on my blog, i dunno if anyone noticed but if you were waiting, i apologize.. and welcome to all the new followers :)
I'm determined to make Grad school different. I'll be with the same group of people all day, everyday so that silly trend in undergrad just won't fly. I don't want to be super dressed up at school either. So what's a girl to do?
Our story starts out in high school with our two main characters, Jenko (Channing Tatum) and Schmidt (Jonah Hill). Jenko is your average meathead jock that picks on smart, shy guys like Schmidt. Fast-forward a couple years; Jenko and Schmidt are in the police academy. Both decide to accept their differences and help each other out to graduate. But of course, they suck at being cops and end up getting undercover jobs at 21 Jump Street. Ice Cube stars as their new boss, Captain Dickson (Oh wow is that a subtle penis joke?…), and he assigns them to a high school where a new synthetic drug is being made. Their job is to bust the dealers and suppliers, and make as many jokes involving a man’s nether regions.
Lyons was the one who showed up in court in his little plaid-and-smeg-colored suit (I found it hilarious that his hair matched... well it didn't match the plaid ) and he all but groveled in front of the judge.
Neglect is defined as the failure to provide for the shelter, safety, supervision, and nutritional needs of the child. Child neglect may be physical, educational, or emotional. The assessment of child neglect requires the consideration of cultural values and standards of care as well as the recognition that the failure to provide the necessities of life may be related to poverty.
Not long afterwards, I was at a conference at Manchester Central and sat in one of the free speaker sessions. It was Phil Jones from Brother, describing how he has worked hard to create an entrepreneurial culture in what would otherwise be a typical, hierarchical big company. I suppose I’d only associated Brother with sewing machines up to that point, but I now know they make a range of printers for the home-office but with more of an emphasis on office than home. So now I’m the proud owner of a Brother A3 printer with high-capacity ink cartridges which show no sign of needing replacing any time soon.
I wouldn't say I've had writer's block also, but I just haven't been able to get my mind around a specific topic to write about either. There has been much to think about lately and the fading of summer to autumn always makes me a bit melancholy too. Things are changing in many ways.
01. Replicate 3:15
Here are your random numbers:
11% ABV
Blessings and revelations!
- I love how she sings opera at the top of her lungs when she's in her jumpy seat.
Paper is K&Co, Embossing folder Cart-Us Trendy Flowers Folder
Dipper - Bitter (3.7% ABV)
Here is a before picture of the dining room...
Recept: That's correct.
Farreda: I will not marry you heard that? I will not let you kill my spirit.
"Off, you mean", he laughed. "Although, oddly, it consumes far more power off than on!". But he relented, and continued. "I'm pretty sure that it requires less coolth to keep a beer line at the right temperature than to super-cool a pub cellar. Indeed, if we do cool the cellar below the beer serving temperature, we're using the beer itself as a coolth transfer fluid, in an uninsulated tube, to lower the temperature of the dispense equipment."
- Plans and executes a PSYOP program that produces an understanding and appreciation of U.S. policies and actions.
There is nothing my holiness cannot do.
The sandwich that made Parasol’s famous — the Roast Beef Debris Po’Boy. In my opinion, this is the best Roast Beef Po’Boy served in New Orleans. The Times Picayune has this sandwich dueling with another restaurant, Tracey’s for best in the Irish Channel section of the city. The rivalry as I understand is not exactly a friendly one.
I am sorry if this will hurt some sensitivities, but I'm kind of getting tired of all the men bashing that's becoming so fashionable lately, so I figured it would be useful to hear another perspective.
I have to say £3 rather sticks in my craw and makes me think whether I should have a half or a pint less than I really wanted. I also have to question whether I can justify paying that, or nearly that, in a Robinson’s or a pub company pub, when in the local area I can be paying £2.15 for Holts, £1.99 in Spoons or a mere £1.60 for Sam Smith’s. (Those are pre-budget prices, but they’re unlikely to be more than 10p higher now).
Ok, so image inserting looks...cooler. I'll give you that. What else do I need to test atm?
So here you can see it all ready to go into the oven at 375 F for about 1 and a half hours. The rabbit is all wrapped up in it’s bacon basket, sitting on it’s bed of veggies and its getting the chicken stock poured over it as its last finishing touch.
The total kilometer count will be around 7000 km, and i am sure we’ll all have an amazing adventure, together with the readers of this blog.
It doesn't feel like Septem-
Please spare a few moments if you can and go visit Pami's Blog, and don't forget to let her know you stopped by. Thank you so much Pami for agreeing to be our GD for this challenge, it's been a real pleasure.
On the one hand, some of these people do seem to be suffering from a combination of addiction and hoarding. They obviously experience some sort of high when they are able to save more than 90% at the cash register and that motivates them to continue chasing after that high. And they also love admiring their stockpile. I understand that, without doing what they do, they may not be able to feed and support their families. At the same time, however, there are some issues that need to be dealt with.
The House of Discarded Dreams by Ekaterina Sedia - Sedia's latest is her wildest book to date, which says something if you've delved into The Alchemy of Stone or The Secret History of Moscow. Review to come. Highly recommended.
Anyway, I looked up this ‘ultrasound liposuction’ and apparently it’s a new treatment from America, where a machine sends ultrasound waves into your stomach, which agitate the fat cells in the area (and not affecting other body cells) and breaking the membrane so they break down into Triglycerides and Fatty Acids. These are then removed from the body through your urine, via the Lymphatic system. The theory sounded reasonable, and there were several before and after pictures I found that looked reasonable to I decided to purchase the offer.
You see, there are many things that you kids need to look out for that are clear indications that you’re about to be dumped. Is this a happy topic to talk about? Of course not! But it’s real life…and sort of hilarious, when you think of it.
You start by dropping subtle hints. “Boy, I sure hope the septic system doesn’t explode today.” Or, ”I wonder if giving those Mexican cartel guys my address was a bad idea?” If your guest doesn’t start packing, the next step is to assemble a potpourri of utensils and first aid supplies; tin snips, boning knife, a small chefs blow torch, a red-hot poker for cauterizing wounds, Bactine (no sting formula of course), and two small band-aids. No, I’m not talking about removal of those pesky in-laws. It’s the season for our outdoor friends – the relative of the arachnid family called Ixodidae. Otherwise known as the common tick.
Now beginning the professional portion of our card.
She is not coming back,
Kurt Vonnegut, Jr. – Fortitude
At one point in the story, Quinn's mother, an artist, has a heated discussion with her mother in law about why cultural experiences are important. Quinn's mom ends up simply stating, "Because it's art." And that is, happily, what this book is. A work of art.
The station we were at was again Peru and I was not sure if from here we could get to the C Line. Now emboldened after talking so much Spanish, I asked the girl in the ticket booth “Si al fondo al la isquierda” she said. Very pleased with myself I said “Gracias” and told Viv we just head down there and it is to the left.
When it came to the doors, we had flush oak doors. We made the choice to donate them and swap them out for new primed/paneled doors, since I had a huge fear that just painting them out may look worse than leaving them oak. I wasn't sure how the paint would adhere and how they would wear. The new doors would still be hollow core to save us mega amounts of moola, but I liked the look of them far better than our original oak doors, and we scored them for between $35-$40 a piece on sale.
At first it wasn't popular, but then improvements were made
The book includes cases covering the entire field from unfair competition over trade secrets, copyright, trademarks to patents, wherein only one of the cases is a purely patent law case. The cases are explained in detail in a language that is not always easy to read. However, it gives a good impression on the course of litigation procedures
Q2: Who is the grizzled old man/
*Order RED sauce, not White sauce (unless of course the white sauce is part of your PLAN)
12. Where We Start
But I also believe that, once the price mechanism is set at the right level and precautions are taken to prevent further harm to others, we should allow people freedom of choice. Even if that choice is harmful to oneself.
Also dropped from the meeting was a draft meeting summary by the chair. Developing countries said they objected to the summary on the grounds that it is not legally binding and could be used to circumvent WIPO procedure requiring a report agreed to by all participants. That report is due to WIPO's General Assembly at the end of July.
It's been a while since I listened to this song, and all the others by Dido.
This was really easy for me to put together and I’m hoping that as I come across items I’m unsure of that I’ll be able to compare them to this list and determine if they should stay or go.
(Brooklyn, New York)— Council Member Letitia James is calling on Mayor Michael Bloomberg to ensure that all students who meet the academic criteria and apply to the schools of applied science at Cornell University and the Technion-Israel Institute of Technology— which will be located on Manhattan’s Roosevelt Island— not be denied admission due to financial hardship.
The Narrowboat - My favourite pub in London right by the canal. They people are friendly, the food is always good and it is warm and cosy. You can spend some time shopping in Islington and then wander down here to relax.
Much like my creative writing work for the latter half of 2011, alas.
The well-organised black gang – made up of Mozambicans, South Africans and Somalians – hold scores of people hostage for ransom, many farmers along the long border are being attacked, two Pakistani men were shot execution style by the gang recently, a woman's head was nearly severed from her body and a Mozambican woman managed to tell of her ordeal to a South African taxi-driver after she escaped with her boy-friend: she was gang-raped for more than 10 hours by the gang.
The thing that makes it hard is that I don’t feel my age. I don’t remember what being thirty was like exactly, but for the most part, I feel the same kind of energy that I did back then. In many ways I feel better about myself and where I am with life. It’s the age thing and the physical changes that catch me off guard. Since there is nothing that can be done about the age, I decided a few months ago, October to be exact, that I was going to do something about the physical.
I choose the north approach - partly because I've never climbed from that side before, and partly because this will get the hill out of the way early. Once it's behind me, the toils of the business will be over and the sweets begun (to borrow a phrase from Miss Austen).
8 A Saucerful Of Secrets
This comp documents a scene I know very little about and I got almost nothing to go off of. I wanna say it came out in 1983 so in that respect it’s well ahead of my time. I heard rumors of Vegas having wild disparate “punk” scenes that went back to the 60’s with numerous parties and shows happening at Pabco and other roundabout places. Shit, back then Pabco was like 15-20 miles outside of town! That must have been the shit. Who knows what happened?
Copyright Hurtled to 60 and Now Beyond 2012 and AarTee Photography 2012
Indeed, it is the biological imperative at work; men do a little peacocking, women accept or reject. Don’t get me wrong, men select and reject also, but women have lots of power. And yet, perhaps a suitable, healthy, compatible mate would come precisely from the population of those I’ve rejected. Perhaps I am over-selective based on bad experiences. Perhaps others do the very same thing.
Question the power of such a website?
I don't think Tucker would be appearing on Fox News again.
This should be happening over the weekend so I’ll be popping back out there early in the week to see what it looks like.
According to RateBeer reviewers this used to be higher abv of 3.0% but I am guessing that due to the tax changes that InBev decided to cut the abv to take advantage. I admit I wasn't too keen to try this beer until I read the reviews on RateBeer as I was worried this would be a Guinness type affair. I was reassured by the reviews that it actually isn't a bad stout so.. cracking open the can.
6.) Two words: Gnome Illusionist.
thrown the ice picks in the back.
Damien Downing, M.D. (United Kingdom)
Wrote down 10 things I was grateful for, everyday, for a year
Today a friend messaged me that she is going to make a wire sculpture and wanted to know if I had any tips to share with her. I wanted to photograph my horse to show her how to make these joints.
Was I ever cool?
Emerie has been enjoying preschool SO much,
SESAME DRESSING RECIPE
It surrounds my core of being,
For students to record inspiring thoughts from their readings:
Heat the oil, fry the onion until translucent. Add in ginger and garlic, fry until fragrant.
And guess what? There’s nothing as stimulating to us as our own interests, desires, ambitions, goals, yearnings and emotions. For our whole lives, that is all we really have. So as long as your copy addresses those things for your prospect, it is guaranteed to carry them along in a rapt, semi-torpid daze of introspection.
As in the Lancashire league the pros are expected to both make runs and take wickets, and, at the end of the day, Cambridge’s pros Zafar Ansari and Paul Best must have been looking forward to a decent collection when the bucket came round. These are the two left arm spinners who we met earlier in the season being set on Kevin Pietersen like a couple of Jack Russells. Since then Ansari has won the Man of the Match award in his 20/20 debut for Surrey. Best we met before at Grace Road locking horns with Taylor et al. while playing for Warwickshire.
(Pause my Playlist at bottom of page first. Click 2nd button on left.)
Poised at the beginning of the craze, this magazine looks to be something of a national platform for Flapperdom. NOT FOR OLD FOGGIES. A flapper flock in every town. What is Home Without THE FLAPPER? Impossible! Here is the second issue of The Flapper published out of the windy city.
Tomorrow is back to work, boooo, I can’t believe just a week ago I was snorkling and feeding sting rays in the middle of the ocean…
They all attack each other, and JB with Garrett runs Bischoff right into the crapper and well, Bischoff comes out all brown. Not a very good segment, ending the show.
Upon arrival, the baby's heart rate was checked, all was good. Then I was checked. Fully effaced but only 1.5 cm dilated and baby is still posterior. My heart sunk a bit but I convinced myself that it was because of the taxi fiasco and I must have managed to shut my labor down completely. So, we were left to continue laboring and I focused on opening up. I was safe now, no more traveling and I could really go into myself and make it happen. The contractions started back up heavy and though we were both exhausted and I had not really eaten all day, we continued the cycle of Nerves. Sledghammer. Counterpressure. Knees. Repeat....
“Is there the positive significance of these rituals (or sacraments) of the communion which are practiced in the Catholic and Orthodox churches? Do they really help the followers of these religious traditions?
We participate in mostly Belgian projects but over the last years
First ‘locked room’ mystery – John Dickson Carr is considered the master of the “locked room” but the first to appear was The Big Bow Mystery by Israel Zangwill (1891). It’s an excellent tale of about 100 pages.
For now he was sure that it came from St. Nick.
They always perform dressed up in white overalls (used by painters to protect their clothing), with hoods over their heads.
Wiped butts, cleaned out cotton diapers, and washed dirty clothes and sheets, because it allowed me the opportunity to demonstrate that nature happens, that it is all okay, and that it is nothing to fear.
1) Not kill Alli. (or at the very least keep her reasonably alive)
And don't forget- we will be doing ticket giveaways via our Facebook and Twitter profiles- give us a follow and be our fan for a chance to win!
For what one used to accrue.
I am also going to try something new in the newsletter to just put the link for the blog in and then you go directly there for the recipes. I am hoping that some of you will comment at the end of the post and offer up ideas of what you are cooking this week, not necessarily the recipes, just some more ideas. (You can do this, by clicking on the word comment at the top of the post for the week and it will allow you to post comments.)
Harry has not been at all well since his last chemo and has not picked up very well. He is suffering from anaemia and has oedema of the legs and tummy which the doctor is treating with different drugs. I hope he will respond to these.
Buttons, ribbon, & inside sentiment: My stash
Answer a fool according to his folly, lest he be wise in his own conceit
i want to rampage through the city with toy weaponry
This month the lovely and very busy mamma Jac from Tinned Tomatoes and I have teamed up to bring you a double-headed challenge whammy... Random Recipes does No Crouton's Required!
And for a moment, they were those kids again.
In particular, he urged Brazil to work with the United States to help improve African militaries by conducting combined exercises and other training. U.S. officials have identified the terrorist threat coming out of Africa from al Qaeda linked groups as a growing international security problem.
“I’m fine,” I half slur half sob.
In addition to the Coordinated Tribal Solicitation that is currently open, the Department of Justice recently released a Solicitation for its new Children Exposed to Violence Initiative and tribal governments are eligible to apply for this project as well. A key component of the Initiative is a demonstration project, which will be divided into planning and implementation phases. During the planning phase, the Department will fund up to eight sites to develop comprehensive, multi-disciplinary approaches to address the needs of children (ages 0 – 17 ) exposed to violence. Two of the eight sites will be awarded to tribal communities.
Accessories: embossed chipboard piece, Spellbinders Labels 25, Jute ribbon, Jute Twine, Twill ribbon ( bought it while we were stationed in Japan over 6 years ago :D), antique silver paw charm
Git Beckinside, South African Police Chief
The people crowded on both banks, watching how these pearls
The words began to stick, and tears to flow
In the SAPS, we start with a perception that the parent defines the vision, the parent does the work, the parent provides the choices, and the parent gets to dole out the freedoms as rewards for conformity to the vision. We begin with an understanding that freedoms do not support the vision, and therefore must be restricted so that the children can do their part, look their part, and act their part. We completely lose the very foundation of freedoms - that we are born with them, that we are entitled to them, that our genes wire us pursue them - and assume that we, as parents, are obligated to grant them to our children and to each other. And when parents from other SAPS families see kids who have been "granted" freedoms, they question and judge those who "provide" greater freedoms to their children.
pinch, cane sugar
2 Packages 8 oz. cream cheese, softened
Ridiculous circumstances have a way of following me. I have long ago learned to enjoy them. I have also learned to… learn from them. Which is why I have now taken to heart the words of a very wise instructor. “Get out and scout. Know what you are getting into before you get into it.”
The original designer, Tony Tripp, died in 2003, and his design is recreated by Richard Roberts and Tracy Grant Lord (who realised the sumptuous costumes). Geoffrey Rush and Jane Menelaus, who played John Worthing and Gwendolen in the original production, are respectively Lady Bracknell and Miss Prism in this one. It's fair to say that this is a production rich with nostalgia: so many of the original cast members - Monica Maughan, Ruth Cracknell, Frank Thring and Gordon Chater - have since died. Tempus fugit, indeed.
But Paris has another side - a vibrant richly jewelled persona
I meant to post this the other day.
I consider breaking into a verse of song at this but bite my tongue.
Ntom Tom Be Wu (Aha Yede Remix) - Nana Boroo
And as we enjoy our gifts, let us never forget
We’ve all seen this painting before, after all it’s one of those ‘classic’ pieces. “American Gothic.” Kind of a strange title for the scene if you ask me. “The Boring Husband,” “The Unfulfilled Wife,” “Mid-Western ‘Drought’” are suggestions I would’ve made (emphasis on the word ‘drought’ – this is a metaphor Ladies and Gentlemen).
First we will have a meet & greet with the 77th Precinct, this will include officers from the command as well as the Impact Zone. This is a great time to get any NYPD related questions answered especially if it is hard for you to attend the 77th Precinct Community Council meetings.
The Shakeology cleanse is not fasting. It’s a nutrient dense way of eating for 3 days that allows your body to re-energize. The clean, simple, easy to digest food allows your body to process waste… and the fiber in the salad and shakes act like a towel in your system for a squeaky clean start to your diet or to break a plateau. It’s a cleanse that gives you the nutrients you need.
motorcycles and mayhem
His final piece of silverware was the 2008 FA Cup he won with Portsmouth.
They are however, really soft. I lost the ballband (of course I did) and I think there might be some silk in these babies!
#occupytheincome
Breakfast: Kashi Fiber cereal with kiwi and almond milk
Reveal 7 things you don’t know about myself that you already don’t know (Or something like that)
"Dad this is my new boyfriend, Mohamed."
